रजिस्ट्री सं. डी.एल. (एन) 04/0007/2003—05 REGD. NO. 0. L. (N) 04/0007/2003—05 


VWitd = राजपतन्र 


Che Gazette of Jndia 


सी.जी.-डी.एल.-सा.-26082023-248364 
CG-DL-W-26082023-248364 


प्राधिकार से प्रकाशित 
PUBLISHED BY AUTHORITY 


साप्ताहिक 
WEEKLY 


सं. 31] नई दिल्‍ली, अगस्त 13---अगस्त 19, 2023, शनिवार/ श्रावण 22--श्रावण 28, 1945 
No. 31] | NEW DELHI, AUGUST 13—AUGUST 19, 2023, SATURDA Y/SHRA VANA 22—SHRAVANA 28, 1945 


इस भाग में भिन्‍न पृष्ठ संख्या दी जाती है जिससे कि यह पृथक संकलन के रुप में रखा जा सके 
Separate Paging is given to this Part in order that it may be filed as a separate compilation 


भाग 1---खण्ड 3—34-aue (i) 
PART II—Section 3—Sub-section (i) 


भारत सरकार के मंत्रालयों (रक्षा मंत्रालय को छोड़कर) और केन्द्रीय अधिकारियों (संघ राज्य क्षेत्र प्रशासनों को छोड़कर) द्वारा विधि के 
अंतर्गत बनाए गए और जारी किए गए साधारण सांविधिक नियम (जिनमें साधारण प्रकार के आदेश, उप-नियम आदि सम्मिलित हैं) 


General Statutory Rules (Including Orders, Bye-laws etc. of a general character) issued by the Ministries of the 
Government of India (other than the Ministry of Defence) and by the Central Authorities (other than the 
Administrations of Union Territories) 


कृषि एवं किसान कल्याण मंत्रालय 
(कृषि एवं किसान कल्याण विभाग) 
नई दिल्‍ली, 11 अगस्त, 2023 
सा.का.नि. 99.--राष्ट्रपति, संविधान के अनुच्छेद 309 के परंतुक द्वारा प्रदत्त शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हुए और 
कृषि मंत्रालय, कृषि और सहकारिता विभाग, (समूह 'क'") बीज प्रभाग भर्ती नियम, 2015 को उन बातों के सिवाय अधिकृत 
करते हुए जिन्हें ऐसे अधिक्रमण से पूर्व किया गया है या करने का लोप किया गया है, कृषि एवं किसान कल्याण विभाग के 


अधीन बीज प्रभाग में तकनीकी समूह 'क' पदों पर भर्ती की रीति को विनियमित करने के लिए निम्नलिखित नियम बनाते 
हैं, अर्थात्‌ :- 


5075 01/2023 (591) 


592 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


1. संक्षिप्त नाम और प्रारंभ.- (1) इन नियमों का संक्षिप नाम कृषि एवं किसान कल्याण मंत्रालय, कृषि एवं किसान कल्याण 
विभाग, बीज प्रभाग (समूह 'क') भर्ती नियम, 2023 है। 


(2) ये सरकारी राजपत्र में उनके प्रकाशन की तारीख से प्रवृत्त होंगे। 
2. लागू होना: ये नियम, इन नियमों के साथ संलग्न अनुसूची के स्तम्भ (1) में विनिर्दिष्ट पदों पर लागू होंगे। 
3. पद-संख्या, वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर-उक्त पद/पदों की संख्या, उसका/उनका वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में 


उसका/उनका स्तर या वेतनमान वह होगा/वे होंगे जो इन नियमों से उपाबद्ध अनुसूची के स्तम्भ (2) से स्तम्भ (4) में 
विनिर्दि्ट हैं । 


4. भर्ती का पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, एवं अर्हताएं, आदि- उक्त पद/पदों पर भर्ती का पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं और उससे/उनसे 
संबंधित अन्य बातें वे होंगी जो उक्त/पूर्वोक्त अनुसूची के स्तम्भ (5) से स्तम्भ (13) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 
5. निरहता- वह व्यक्ति,- 

(क) जिसने ऐसे व्यक्ति से, जिसका पति या पत्नी जीवित है, विवाह किया है, या विवाह की संविदा की है; या 


(ख) जिसने अपने पति या पत्नी के जीवित रहते हुए किसी व्यक्ति से विवाह किया है या विवाह की संविदा की है, 


उक्त पद/पदों पर नियुक्ति का पात्र नहीं होगा: 


परन्तु यदि केंद्रीय सरकार का यह समाधान हो जाता है कि ऐसा विवाह ऐसे व्यक्ति और विवाह के अन्य पक्षकार को लागू 
cate विधि के अधीन अनुज्ञेय है और ऐसा करने के लिए अन्य आधार हैं तो वह किसी व्यक्ति को किसी नियम के प्रवर्तन से 
छूट दे सकेगी। 


6. शिथिल करने की शक्ति.- जहां केंद्रीय सरकार की यह राय है कि ऐसा करना आवश्यक या समीचीन है, वहाँ वह उसके 
लिए जो कारण है उन्हें लेखबद्ध करके तथा संघ लोक सेवा आयोग से परामर्श करके इन नियमों के किसी उपबंध को किसी 
वर्ग या प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों की बाबत, आदेश द्वारा शिथिल कर सकेगी । 


7. व्यावृति.-इन नियमों की कोई बात, ऐसे आरक्षण/आरक्षणों, आयु सीमा में छूट और अन्य रियायतों पर प्रभाव नहीं 
डालेगी, जिनका केंद्रीय सरकार द्वारा इस संबंध में समय-समय पर जारी किये गये आदेशों के अनुसार अनुसूचित जातियों, 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों, अन्य पिछड़े वर्गों, भूतपूर्व सैनिकों और अन्य विशेष प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों के लिए उपबंध करना 
अपेक्षित = | 


अनुसूची 
पद का नाम पदों की संख्या वर्गीकरण 
(1) (2) (3) 
1. उपायुक्त (बीज) | 2 (2023) साधारण केंद्रीय सेवा 
“(कार्यभार के आधार पर परिवर्तन समूह 'क', राजपत्रित, 


अननुसचिवीय | 


किया जा सकता Sl) | 


| वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर चाहे चयन या गैर | सीधी भर्ती के लिए आयु | सीधी भर्ती के लिए आवश्यक शैक्षिक 
चयन पद हो सीमा और अन्य योग्यताएँ 
(4) (5) (6) (7) 
वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर-12 चयन | लागू नहीं होता | लागू नहीं होता | 
(रु. 78800-209200) | 


[भाग 1--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 593 


क्या सीधी भर्ती के लिए निर्धारित आयुपरिवीक्षा की अवधि, यदि कोई हो. भर्ती का तरीका चाहे सीधी भर्ती द्वारा 

और शैक्षणिक योग्यताएं प्रोन्नति लोगों के हो या प्रोन्नति द्वारा या प्रतिनियुक्ति या 

मामले में लागू होंगी आमेलन द्वारा और विभिन्न तरीकों से| 
भरी जाने वाली रिक्तियों का प्रतिशत 

(6) (9) (10) 
लागू नहीं होता। लागू नहीं होता। प्रोन्नति द्वारा, जिसके ना हो सकने पर 

प्रतिनियुक्ति द्वारा (जिसके अंतर्गत 
अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) | 


प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन द्वारा भर्ती के मामले में, वे श्रेणियां जिनसे प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति / आमेलन किया जाना है 


प्रोन्नति द्वारा: 


सहायक आयुक्त (बीज)जिसने इस ग्रेड में वेतन मेट्रिक्स के स्‍्तर-11 (67700-208700 रुपये) में पांच वर्ष की नियमित सेवा 
की हो तथा केंद्रीय सरकार अथवा राज्य सरकार अथवा किसी मान्यताप्राप्त संस्थान से पौध Peat ar किसान अधिकार 
संरक्षण और खाद्य एवं कृषि अथवा बीज उत्पादन (अनाजों, श्रीअन्न, दलहन या तिलहन या सब्जियों आदि) के लिए पादप 
आनुवंशिक संसाधन के संरक्षण और धारणीय उपयोग अथवा बीज प्रसंस्करण अथवा बीज विपणन अथवा बीज गुणवत्ता 
नियंत्रण अथवा विनियम अथवा बीज विधि प्रवर्तन अथवा निर्यात अथवा आयात से संबंधित विषयगत क्षेत्र में कम से कम 
दो से चार सप्ताह का या भारतीय कृषि अनुसंधान परिषद या इसके फसल आधारित अनुसंधान संस्थान द्वारा बीज से 
संबंधित विषयों के संबंध में संचालित विद्यालय से इद्कीस दिवसीय ग्रीष्मकालीन या शीतकालीन प्रशिक्षण सफलतापूर्वक 
पूरा किया हो; 


टिप्पण: जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में,जिन्होंने अपनी अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली है, प्रोन्नति के लिए 
विचार किया जा रहा हो, वहां उनके ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के सम्बंध में भी विचार किया जाएगा परंतु यह तब जब कि उसके 
द्वारा की गई ऐसी अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित अर्ईधक या पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक से या दो वर्ष से, इनमें से जो भी 
कम हो, कम न हो और उन्होने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होने ऐसी अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा पहले ही पूरी कर 
ली है, अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली ST 


प्रतिनियुक्ति द्वारा (जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है): 


केंद्रीय या राज्य सरकारों या संघ राज्य क्षेत्रों के प्रशासन या सार्वजनिक क्षेत्र के उपक्रमों या कृषि विश्वविद्यालयों या 
मान्यता प्राप्त अनुसंधान संस्थानों या अर्ध सरकारी या स्वायत्त निकायों या वैधानिक संगठनों के अधीन ऐसे अधिकारी जो : 


(क) (i) मूल कैडर या विभाग में नियमित आधार पर सदृश पद धारण किये हो; या 


(1) मूल संवर्ग या विभाग में वेतन मैट्रिक्स के स्तर-11 (रु. 67700-208700) या समतुल्य पदों पर नियमित आधार पर 
नियुक्ति के बाद प्रदान किए गए उस श्रेणी में पांच वर्ष की सेवा की हो; और 


(ख) निम्नलिखित शैक्षिक अर्हता और अनुभव रखते हो: - 
आवश्यक: 


(i) किसी मान्यता प्राप्त विश्वविद्यालय या संस्थान से oer विज्ञान या पादप प्रजनन और आनुवंशिकी या बीज 
प्रौद्योगिकी या कृषि वनस्पति विज्ञान में विशेषज्ञता के साथ कृषि में स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री। 


(ii) किसी सरकारी कार्यालय या सार्वजनिक क्षेत्र के उपक्रम या कृषि विश्वविद्यालय या स्वायत्त या सांविधिक निकाय या 


594 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


— मान्यता प्राप्त संस्थान में बीज उत्पादन या बीज विपणन या बीज प्रमाणन या बीज परीक्षण या बीज गुणवत्ता 
नियंत्रण के क्षेत्र में आठ वर्ष का अनुभव। 


वांछनीय: 
किसी मान्यताप्राप्त विश्वविद्यालय या संस्थान से बीज प्रौद्योगिकी में डॉक्टरेट की डिग्री। 


टिप्पण 1: पोषक प्रवर्ग के ऐसे विभागीय अधिकारी, जो पदोन्नति की सीधी पंक्ति में हैं, प्रतिनियुक्ति पर नियुक्ति के लिए 
विचार किये जाने के पात्र नहीं होंगे। इसी प्रकार प्रतिनियुक्त व्यक्ति प्रोन्नति द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए विचार किये जाने के लिए 
पात्र नहीं होंगे। 

टिप्पण 2: प्रतिनियुक्ति (जिसके अन्तर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) की अवधि, जिसके अन्तर्गत केंद्रीय सरकार के उसी या 
किसी अन्य संगठन या विभाग में इस नियुक्ति से ठीक पहले धारित किसी अन्य कैडर ate] पद पर प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि है 
साधारणतया 4 वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी। 


टिप्पण 3: प्रतिनियुक्ति (जिसके अन्तर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए अधिकतम आयु-सीमा, आवेदन 
प्राप्त होने की अंतिम तिथि को 56 वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी। 


यदि कोई विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति विद्यमान है तो उसकी संरचना sara परिस्थितियाँ जिनमें भर्ती करने के लिए संघ लोक 
है? सेवा आयोग से परामर्श किया जाना है 
(12) (13) 


समूह 'क' विभागीय प्रोन्‍नति समिति ( प्रोन्नति पर विचार करने के लिए)किसी अधिकारी को प्रतिनियुक्ति (अल्पकालिक 
जिसमें निम्नलिखित शामिल हैं: संविदा सहित) आधार पर नियुक्त करने के लिए संघ 
लोक सेवा आयोग से परामर्श करना आवश्यक है। 


1. अध्यक्ष या सदस्य, संघ लोक सेवा आयोग-अध्यक्ष; 
2. संयुक्त सचिव, बीज प्रभाग के भारसाधक-सदस्य; 
3. संयुक्त सचिव, प्रशासन प्रभाग के भारसाधक-सदस्य। 


(1) (2) (3) 


2. सहायक आयुक्त (बीज) | 3(2023) केंद्रीय साधारण सेवा समूह 'क', राजपत्रित, 
“(कार्यभार के आधार पर परिवर्तन अननुसचिवीय । 
किया जा सकता Sl) | 


(4) (5) (6) 
वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर-11 चयन | चालीस वर्ष से अनाधिक । 
(रु. 67700-208700/-) | टिप्पण 1: केंद्रीय सरकार द्वारा जारी निर्देशों या आदेशों के 
अनुसार सरकारी कर्मचारियों के लिए पांच साल तक की 
छूट। 


टिप्पण 2: आयु-सीमा निर्धारित करने की निर्णायक तारीख 
संघ लोक सेवा आयोग द्वारा दिए गए विज्ञापन के अनुसार 


होगी। 


[भाग 1--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 595 


(7) 


आवश्यक: 
किसी सरकारी कार्यालय या पब्लिक सेक्टर उपक्रम या स्वायत्त निकाय या कानूनी निकाय या किसी मान्यता प्राप्त 
विश्वविद्यालय या संस्था में बीज उत्पादन या बीज विपणन या बीज प्रमाणन या बीज परीक्षण या बीज क़ालिटी नियंत्रण 


के क्षेत्र में 5 वर्ष के अनुभव के साथ किसी मान्यता प्राप्त विश्वविद्यालय या संस्थान से एग्रोनॉमी या प्लांट ब्रीडिंग और 
जेनेटिक्स या बीज प्रौद्योगिकी या कृषि वनस्पति विज्ञान में विशेषज्ञता के साथ कृषि में मास्टर डिग्री । 
वांछनीय: 


किसी मान्यताप्राप्त विश्वविद्यालय या संस्थान से बीज प्रौद्योगिकी में डॉक्टरेट की डिग्री। 


टिप्पण1: अनुभव संबंधी अर्हताएं उन कारणों के लिए जो लेखवध किए जाएं संघ लोक सेवा आयोग के विवेकानुसार 
शिथिल की जा सकती है। 

टिप्पण 2: अनुसूचित जातियों और अनुसूचित जनजातियों के अभ्यर्थियों की दशा में तब शिथिल की जा सकती है जब 
चयन की किसी प्रक्रम पर संघ लोक सेवा आयोग की यह राय है कि उनके लिए आरक्षित रिक्तियों को भरने के लिए 
अपेक्षित अनुभव रखने वाले उन समुदायों के अभ्यर्थियों के पर्याप्त संख्या में उपलब्ध होने की संभावना नहीं है | 


(6) (9) (10) 
उम्र: नहीं सीधी भर्ती किये जाने वाले व्यक्तियों 33% प्रोन्नति द्वारा, जिसके ना हो 
शैक्षिक aga: नहीं, के लिए एक वर्ष। सकने पर प्रतिनियुक्ति द्वारा 
लेकिन किसी मान्यता टिप्पण : सीधी भर्ती किये जाने वाले (जिसके अंतर्गत aerate 


अभ्यर्थियों से परिवीक्षा पूरी करने के eee 
a Riess लिए सक्षम प्राधिकारी द्वारा |S fae re) 
ar aan ft ft यथाविहित कम से कम दो सप्ताह की 67% सीधी भर्ती द्वारा | 
होनी चाहिए। अवधि का आज्ञापक प्रवेश प्रशिक्षण 
सफलतापूर्वक पूरा करना अपेक्षित है। 


(11) 


द्वारा: 
वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर -10 (रुपये 56100-177500) में, ऐसे सहायक निदेशक (बीज), जिन्होंने उस श्रेणी में 5 वर्ष की 
नियमित सेवा की हो और केंद्रीय सरकार या राज्य सरकार या किसी मान्यता प्राप्त संस्थान के अधीन किसी भी संस्थान में 
हाइब्रिड बीज उत्पादन, प्रसंस्करण और विपणन, बीज क्वालिटी नियंत्रण एवं विकास और बीज उत्पादन सहित बीज 
उत्पादन में आज्ञापक प्रशिक्षण सफलतापूर्वक पूरा किया हो | 

: जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में, जिन्होंने अपनी अर्ईक/पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली है प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार 
किया जा रहा हो, वहां उनके ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी विचार किया जाएगा परंतु यह तब जबकि उसके द्वारा की 
गई ऐसी अर्हक/पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित अर्ईक/पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक से या 2 वर्ष से, इनमें से जो भी कम हो, कम 
ना हो और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी अर्हक/पात्रता सेवा पहले ही पूरी कर ली है, अगली 
उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली हो | 

(जिसके अन्तर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है): 


केंद्रीय सरकार या राज्य सरकारों या संघ राज्य क्षेत्र प्रशासन या पब्लिक सेक्टर के उपक्रमों या कानूनीसंगठनों या स्वायत्त 
या मान्यता प्राप्त विश्वविद्यालयों या अनुसंधान संस्थानों के अधीन अधिकारी: 


(क) () जो मूल काडर या विभाग में नियमित आधार पर सदृश पद धारण किये हो; 


596 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


(1) जिन्होंने मूल काडर या विभाग में वेतन मैट्रिक्स स्तर -10 (रुपये 56100-177500) या समतुल्य पदों पर नियमित 
आधार पर नियुक्ति के बाद उस श्रेणी में पांच वर्ष की नियमित सेवा की हो; और 
(ख) स्तम्भ (7) के अधीन सीधी भर्ती किए जानेवाले व्यक्तियों के लिए विहित शैक्षणिक अर्हता और अनुभव रखते हों | 

1: पोषक प्रवर्ग के ऐसे विभागीय अधिकारी, जो प्रोन्नति की सीधी पंक्ति में है, प्रतिनियुक्ति पर नियुक्ति के लिए 
विचार किए जाने के पात्र नहीं होंगे । इसी प्रकार प्रतिनियुक्ति व्यक्ति प्रोन्नति द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए विचार किए जाने के 
पात्र नहीं होंगे | 

2: प्रतिनियुक्ति (जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) की अवधि जिसके अंतर्गत केंद्रीय सरकार के उसी या 
किसी अन्य संगठन/ विभाग में इस नियुक्ति से ठीक पहले धारित किसी अन्य कैडर arey पद पर प्रतिनियुक्ति (जिसके 
अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) की अवधि है, साधारणतया 4 वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी | 


3: प्रतिनियुक्ति (जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) पर नियुक्ति के लिए अधिकतम आयु सीमा आवेदन 
प्राप्त करने की अंतिम तिथि को 56 वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी। 


(12) 


समूह 'क' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति पर विचार | समूह 'क' विभागीय पुष्टिकरण समिति (पुष्टि पर विचार 

करने के लिए) जो निम्नलिखित से मिल कर बनेगी : करने के लिए) जो निम्नलिखित से मिल कर बनेगी : 

1. संयुक्त सचिव, भारसाधक प्रशासन प्रभाग, कृषि एवं | 1. संयुक्त सचिव, भारसाधक प्रशासन प्रभाग, कृषि एवं 
किसान कल्याण विभाग -अध्यक्ष; किसान कल्याण विभाग -अध्यक्ष; 

2. संयुक्त सचिव, भारसाधक बीज प्रभाग, कृषि एवं| 2. संयुक्त सचिव, भारसाधक बीज प्रभाग, कृषि एवं 
किसान कल्याण विभाग -सदस्य; किसान कल्याण विभाग -सदस्य; 

3. निदेशक या उप सचिव (कार्मिक), कृषि एवं किसान | 3. निदेशक या उप सचिव (कार्मिक), कृषि एवं किसान 
कल्याण विभाग-सदस्य। कल्याण विभाग -सदस्य। 


(13) 


सीधी भर्ती और प्रतिनियुक्ति (जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) के आधार पर एक अधिकारी की नियुक्ति के लिए 
संघ लोकसेवा आयोग से परामर्श आवश्यक है। 


(1) (2) (3) 
3. सहायक निदेशक (बीज) | 2- 2023 सामान्य केंद्रीय सेवा समूह FH’, राजपत्रित, 
*कार्यभार के आधार पर गैर-मंत्रालयी । 
परिवर्तन किया जा सकता है। 


(4 े 5, |... (6). ' 
वेतन मैट्रिक्स में वेतन श्रेणी में स्‍्तर-10 लागू ] 35 वर्ष से अनाधिक | 


(रुपये 56100-177500/-) | टिप्पण 1: केंद्रीय सरकार द्वारा जारी निर्देशों या 
आदेशों के अनुसार सरकारी कर्मचारियों के लिए 
पांच साल तक की छूट। 


टिप्पण 2: आयु-सीमा निर्धारित करने की 
निर्णायक तारीख संघ लोक सेवा आयोग द्वारा 
दिए गए विज्ञापन के अनुसार होगी। 


[भाग 1--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 597 


(7) 


आवश्यक: 


किसी मान्यताप्राप्त विश्वविद्यालय या संस्थान से कृषि विज्ञान या प्लांट ब्रीडिंग और जेनेटिक्स या बीज प्रौद्योगिकी या कृषि 
वनस्पति विज्ञान में विशेषज्ञता के साथ कृषि में स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री और किसी सरकारी कार्यालय या पब्लिक सेक्टर के 
उपक्रम या स्वायत्त निकाय या कानूनी निकाय या किसी मान्यता प्राप्त विश्व विद्यालय या संस्था में बीज उत्पादन या बीज 
विपणन या बीज प्रमाणीकरण या बीज परीक्षण या बीज क्वालिटी नियंत्रण के क्षेत्र में तीन वर्ष का अनुभव। 


टिप्पण 1: सुअर्हित अभ्यर्थियों की दशा में, अर्हताएं, संघ लोक सेवा आयोग के विवेकानुसार शिथिल की जा सकती है। 


टिप्पण 2: अनुभव संबंधी अर्हता(अर्हताएं) संघ लोक सेवा आयोग के विवेकानुसार अनुसूचित जातियों और अनुसूचित 
जनजातियों के अभ्यर्थियों की दशा में तब शिथिल की जा सकती है जब चयन के किसी प्रक्रम पर संघ लोक सेवा आयोग की 


यह राय है कि उनके लिए आरक्षित रिक्तियों को भरने के लिए अपेक्षित अनुभव रखने वाले उन समुदाय के अभ्यर्थियों के 
पर्याप्त संख्या में उपलब्ध होने की संभावना नहीं है | 


(8) (9) (10) 
आयु: नहीं सीधी भर्ती किये जाने वाले और प्रोन्नति किये जाने|समग्र पद्धति से 50 प्रतिशत [अर्थात्‌ 
वाले व्यक्तियों के लिए एक वर्ष । 


अल्पकालिक अनुबंध सहित प्रतिनियुक्ति और 
टिप्पण: सीधी भर्ती किये जाने वाले अभ्यर्थियों को प्रोन्नति] 

परिवीक्षा पूरी करने के लिए सक्षम प्राधिकारी| 56 प्रतिशत सीधी भर्ती ar | 

द्वारा विहित कम से कम दो सप्ताह की अवधि aT 
आज्ञापक प्रवेश प्रशिक्षण सफलतापूर्वक पूरा करना 
आवश्यक है। 


शैक्षिक योग्यता: नहीं 


संयुक्त विधि [प्रतिनियुक्ति (जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) + आमलेन J: 


केंद्रीय सरकार या राज्य सरकारों या संघ राज्य क्षेत्र प्रशासनों या कानूनी स्वशासी संगठनों यापब्लिक सेक्टर उपक्रम या 
मान्यता प्राप्त अनुसंधान संस्थाओं के अधीन ऐसे अधिकारी: 


(क) (i) जिन्होंने मूल कैडर या विभाग में नियमित आधार पर सदृश पद धारण किया हुआ है; या 


(ii) जिन्होंने मूल काडर या विभाग में वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर- 9 (रुपये 53100-167800) या समतुल्य में नियमित 
आधार पर उस पद पर नियुक्ति के पश्चात उस श्रेणी में 2 वर्ष की सेवा की हो; या 


(1) जिन्होंने मूल काडर /विभाग में वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर 8 (रुपये 47600-151100) या समतुल्य में नियमित आधार 
पर नियुक्ति के पश्चात उस श्रेणी में 4 वर्ष की सेवा की हो, या 


(iv) जिन्होंने मूल काडर/विभाग में वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्‍तर -7 (रुपये 44900-142400) या समतुल्य के में नियमित 
आधार पर नियुक्ति के पश्चात उस श्रेणी में 5 वर्ष की सेवा की हो; और 


(ख) स्तंभ 7 के अधीन सीधी भर्ती के लिए fated किए गए अनुभव और शैक्षिक अर्हताएं रखता हो | 


टिप्पण 1: ऐसे विभागीय वरिष्ठ तकनीकी सहायक ग्रेड-4 (बीज) पर, जिन्होंने वेतन मैट्रिक्त में स्‍तर 7 (44900- 


142400) की उस श्रेणी में पांच वर्ष नियमित सेवा की है, बाहर वालों के साथ विचार किया जाएगा और उसके पद पर 
नियुक्ति के लिए चयन किए जाने की दशा में वह पद प्रोन्नति द्वारा भरा गया समझा जाएगा। 


598 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


—— आधथ प्रतिनियुक्ति (जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) की अवधि, जिसके अंतर्गत केंद्रीय सरकार के उसी या 
किसी अन्य संगठन/विभाग में इस नियुक्ति से ठीक पहले धारित किसी अन्य काडर बाह्य पद पर प्रतिनियुक्ति (जिसके 
अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) की अवधि है, साधारणतया तीन वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी | 


टिप्पण-3 प्रतिनियुक्ति (जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) पर नियुक्ति के लिए अधिकतम आयु सीमा आवेदन 
प्राप्त करने की अंतिम तारीख को 56 वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी। 


(12) (13) 
समूह 'क' विभागीय पुष्टि समिति (पुष्टि पर विचार करने के लिए) जो | संघ लोक सेवा आयोग से परामर्श आवश्यक 
निम्नलिखित से मिलकर बनेगी: al 
1. संयुक्त सचिव, भारसाधक प्रशासन प्रभाग, 

कृषि और किसान कल्याण विभाग -अध्यक्ष; 
2. संयुक्त सचिव, भारसाधक बीज प्रभाग कृषि और 
किसान कल्याण विभाग - सदस्य; 
3. निदेशक या उप सचिव (कार्मिक), कृषि और 
किसान कल्याण विभाग -सदस्य | 


[फा. सं. 12018/03/2018-ई.]] 


उमेश कुमार साह, अवर सचिव 


MINISTRY OF AGRICULTURE AND FARMERS WELFARE 
(Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare) 
New Delhi, the 11th August, 2023 


G.S.R. 99.—In exercise of the powers conferred by the proviso to article 309 of the Constitution and in 
supersession of the Ministry of Agriculture, Department of Agriculture and Co-operation, (Group ‘A’) Seeds Division 
Recruitment Rules, 2015, except as respect things done or omitted to be done before such supersession, the President 
hereby makes the following rules regulating the method of recruitment to technical Group ‘A’ posts in the Seeds 
Division under the Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare namely:- 


1. Short title and commencement.- (1) These rules may be called the Ministry of Agriculture and Farmers 
Welfare, Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare, Seeds Division (Group ‘A’) Recruitment Rules, 2023. 


(2) They shall come into force on the date of their publication in the Official Gazette. 
2. Application: These rules shall apply to the posts specified in column (1) of schedule annexed to these rules. 


3. Number of posts, classification and level in the pay matrix.- The number of the said posts, their 
classification, pay level in the pay matrix attached thereto shall be as specified in columns (2) to (4) of the Schedule 
annexed to these rules. 


4. Method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications etc.- The method of recruitment to the said posts, age-limit, 
qualifications and other matters relating thereto shall be as specified in columns (5) to (13) of the said Schedule. 


5. Disqualification.- No person,- 
(a) who has entered into or contracted a marriage with a person having a spouse living; 
or 
(b) who, having a spouse living, has entered into or contracted a marriage with any person, 


shall be eligible for appointment to the said post: 


[भाग 1--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 599 


Provided that the Central Government may, if satisfied that such marriage is permissible under the personal 
law applicable to such person and the other party to the marriage and that there are other grounds for so doing, exempt 
any person from the operation of this rule. 


6. Power to relax.- Where the Central Government is of the opinion that it is necessary or expedient so to do, it 
may, by order and for reasons to be recorded in writing, and in consultation with the Union Public Service 
Commission, relax any of the provisions of these rules with respect to any class or category of persons. 


7. Saving.- Nothing in these rules shall affect reservations, relaxation of age-limit and other concessions required 
to be provided for the Scheduled Castes, the Scheduled Tribes, the other backward classes, Ex-Servicemen and other 
special categories of persons in accordance with the orders issued by the Central Government from time to time in this 
regard. 


SCHEDULE 


Name of post Number of posts Classification 


1. Deputy Commissioner (Seeds). 2 (2023) General Central Service 
*(Subject to variation dependent on Group ‘A’, Gazetted, Non- 
workload). ministerial. 

Level in the Pay Matrix | Whether selection or | Age limit for direct | Educational and _ other 

non-selection post recruitment qualifications required for 
direct recruits 
(4) (5) (6) (7) 

Level-12 Selection. Not applicable. Not applicable. 

(Rs.78800-209200) in the 

pay matrix. 

Whether age and Period of Method of recruitment whether by direct 
educational qualifications probation, if any. recruitment or by promotion or by 
prescribed for direct deputation or absorption and percentage of 
recruits will apply in the the vacancies to be filled by various 
case of promotees methods 
(8) (9) (10) 
Not applicable. Not applicable. By promotion failing which by Deputation 
(Including Short-term Contract). 


In the case of recruitment by promotion or deputation/absorption, grades from which promotion or 
deputation/absorption to be made 


(11) 


By promotion: 


Assistant Commissioner (Seeds) in Level-11 (Rs. 67700-208700) in pay matrix with five years regular service in the 
grade and having successfully completed training of at least two to four weeks in the area of protection of Plant 
Varieties or Farmers Rights or Conservation and Sustainable use of Plant Genetic Resource for Food and Agriculture 
or Seed Production (of Cereals, Millets, Pulses or Oilseeds or Vegetables etc.) or Seed Processing or Seed Marketing 
or Seed Quality Control or Regulations or Seed Laws Enforcement or Export or Import related issues from any 
institute under Central Government or State Government or any recognised Institute; or twenty one days summer or 
winter school on Seed related issues organised by Indian Council of Agricultural Research or its crop based research 
Institute. 


Note : Where juniors who have completed their qualifying or eligibility service are being considered for promotion, 
their seniors would also be considered provided they are not short of the requisite qualifying or eligibility service by 
more than half of such qualifying or eligibility service or two years, whichever is less, and have successfully 
completed probation period for promotion to the next higher grade along with their juniors who have already 
completed such qualifying or eligibility service. 


By deputation (including short term contract): 


600 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


Officers under the Central or State Governments or Union territories administrations or Public Sector Undertakings or 
Agricultural Universities or recognised Research Institutions or Semi government or Autonomous bodies or Statutory 
organisations: 


(A) (0) holding analogous post on regular basis in the parent cadre or department ; or 


(ii) with five years service in the grade rendered after appointment thereto on a regular basis in posts in level-11 
(Rs. 67700-208700) of Pay matrix or equivalent in the parent cadre or department; and 


(B) possessing the following educational qualifications and experience:- 
Essential: 


(i) Masters degree in Agriculture with specialisation in Agronomy or Plant Breeding and genetics or Seed 
Technology or Agricultural Botany from a recognised University or Institute. 


(ii) | Eight years experience in the field of Seed Production or Seed Marketing or Seed Certification or Seed 
Testing or Seed Quality Control in a Government office or Public Sector Undertaking or Agricultural University 
or Autonomous or Statutory body or any recognised Institution. 


Desirable: 
Doctorate degree in Seed technology from a recognised University or Institute. 


Note 1: The Departmental officers in the feeder category who are in the direct line of promotion shall not be eligible 
for consideration for appointment on deputation. Similarly, deputationists shall not be eligible for consideration for 
appointment by promotion. 


Note 2: The Period of deputation (Including short-term contract) including period of deputation (Including short-term 
contract) in another ex-cadre post held immediately preceding this appointment in the same or some other 
organisation or Department of the Central Government shall ordinarily not exceed four years. 


Note 3: The maximum age-limit for appointment by deputation (Including short term contract) shall not exceed fifty 
six years as on the closing date of receipt of applications. 


If a Departmental Promotion Committee exists, what is Circumstances in which Union Public 
its composition Service Commission is to be consulted 
in making recruitment 
(12) (13) 
Group ‘A’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for Consultation with Union Public Service 
considering promotion) consisting of: Commission is necessary for appointing 


an officer on deputation (including short- 


1. | Chairman or Member, Union Public हि 
term contract) basis. 


Service Commission -Chairman,; 
2. Joint Secretary, Incharge of Seeds Division -Member; 


3. Joint Secretary, Incharge of Administration 
Division -Member. 


2. Assistant Commissioner (Seeds) 3(2023) General Central Service 


* Subject to variation dependent on | Group ‘A’ ,Gazetted, 
work load. 


Non-ministerial 


(4) (5) (6) 
Level-11 Selection. Not exceeding forty years. 
(Rs.67700-208700/-) in the pay Note 1: Relaxable for Government servants upto five 
matrix. years in accordance with the instructions or orders issued 


by the Central Government. 


Note 2: The crucial date for determining the age-limit 
shall be as advertised by the Union Public Service 


[भाग I—ave 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 601 


Commission. 


(7) 


Essential: 


Masters degree in Agriculture with specialisation in Agronomy or Plant Breeding and genetics or Seed Technology or 
Agricultural Botany from a recognised university or Institute with five years experience in the field of Seed 
Production or Seed Marketing or Seed Certification or Seed Testing or Seed Quality Control in a Government Office 
or Public sector undertaking or Autonomous body or Statutory body or any recognised University or Institution. 


Desirable: 
Doctorate degree in Seed Technology from a recognised University or Institute. 


Note 1: Qualifications are relaxable at the discretion of the Union Public Service Commission for reasons to be 
recorded in writing, in the case of candidates otherwise well qualified 


Note 2: The Qualification regarding experience is relaxable at the discretion of the Union Public Service Commission 
for reasons to be recorded in writing, in case of candidates belonging to Scheduled Tribes if at any stage of selection 
the Union Public Service Commission, is of the opinion that sufficient number of candidates from these communities 
possessing the requisite experience are not likely to be available to fill up the vacancies reserved for them. 


(8) (9) (10) 
Age: No. One year for direct recruits. 33% by Promotion failing 
Educational which by Deputation (Including 
Qualification: No, But Note: Direct Recruits are required to short-term contract) 
must possess atleast a successfully complete a mandatory 
bachelor degree in induction training of at least two weeks 67% by Direct Recruitment. 
Agriculture from a duration, as prescribed by the 
recognised University or competent authority, for completion of 
Institute. probation. 


ता) 


By promotion: 


Assistant Director (Seeds) in level-10 (Rs 56100-177500) in pay matrix with five years regular service in the 
grade, and having successfully completed mandatory training in Seed Production, including Hybrid seed 
production, processing and marketing, Seed Quality control and development and Seed production in any 
institute under the Central Government or State Government or any recognised Institute. 


Note : Where juniors who have completed their qualifying or eligibility service are being considered for 
promotion, their seniors would also be considered provided they are not short of the requisite qualifying or 
eligibility service by more than half of such qualifying or eligibility service or two years, whichever is less, and 
have successfully completed probation period for promotion to the next higher grade along with their juniors 
who have already completed such qualifying or eligibility service. 


Deputation (including short-term contract): 


Officers under Central Government or State Governments or Union territory administrations or Public Sector 
Undertakings or Statutory organisations or Autonomous organisations or recognised Universities or 
Research Institutions: 


(A) (i) holding analogous post on regular basis in the parent cadre or department ; or 


(ii) with five years service in the grade rendered after appointment thereto on a regular basis in posts in 
level-10 (Rs. 56100-177500) in pay matrix or equivalent in the parent cadre or department; and 


(B) possessing the educational qualifications and experience prescribed for direct recruits under column (7). 


Note 1: The Departmental officers in the feeder category who are in the direct line of promotion shall not be 
eligible for consideration for appointment on deputation. Similarly, deputationists shall not be eligible for 
consideration for appointment by promotion. 


Note 2: The Period of deputation (Including short-term contract) including period of deputation (Including 
short-term contract) in another ex-cadre post held immediately preceding this appointment in the same or some 


602 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 


[PART II—SEc. 3(4)] 


| secs cn i es pn nn a | organization or Department of the Central Government shall ordinarily not exceed four years. 


Note 3: The maximum age-limit for appointment by deputation (Including short term contract) shall not 
exceed fifty six years as on the closing date of receipt of applications. 


(12) 


Group ‘A’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for | Group ‘A’ Departmental Confirmation Committee 
considering promotion) consisting of: (for considering confirmation) consisting of: 


1. Joint Secretary, In-charge of Administration 1. Joint Secretary, In-charge of Administration 


Division, Department of Agriculture and 
Farmers Welfare - Chairman; 


Division, Department of Agriculture and 
Farmers Welfare -Chairman; 


2: Joint Secretary, Incharge of Seeds _ Division , 2. Joint Secretary, Incharge of Seeds Division, 
Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare 
- Member; - Member; 

3. Director or Deputy Secretary (Personnel), 3. Director or Deputy Secretary (Personnel), 
Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare 
-Member. —Member. 

(13) 


Consultation with Union Public Service Commission is necessary for making direct recruitment and for appointing an 
officer on deputation (including short term contract) basis. 


(2) 
2 (2023) 
* Subject to variation dependent 


General Central Service 
Group ‘A’ , Gazetted, 
Non-ministerial. 


3. Assistant Director (Seeds). 


on work load. 


(4) (5) (6) 
Level-10 Not applicable. Not exceeding 35 Years. 

(Rs.56100-177500/-) in the pay Note 1: Relaxable for Government servants upto five 

matrix. years in accordance with instructions or orders issue 
by the Central Government. 
Note 2: The crucial date for determining the age-limit 
shall be as advertised by the Union Public Service 
Commission. 

(7) 
Essential: 


Masters degree in Agriculture with specialisation in Agronomy or Plant Breeding and genetics or Seed Technology or 
Agricultural Botany from a recognised University or Institute with three years experience in the field of Seed 
Production or Seed Marketing or Seed Certification or Seed Testing or Seed Quality Control in a Government office 
or Public Sector undertaking or Autonomous or Statutory body or any recognised University or Institution. 


Note 1: Qualifications are relaxable at the discretion of the Union Public Service Commission, for reasons to be 
recorded in writing, in the case of candidates otherwise will qualified. 


Note 2: The qualification regarding experience is relaxable in the discretion of the Union Public Service Commission 
for reasons to be recorded in writing in the case of candidates belonging to Scheduled Castes or Scheduled Tribes if at 
any stage of selection the Union Public Service Commission, is of the opinion the sufficient number of candidates 
from these communities possessing the requisite experience are not likely to be available to fill up the vacancies 
reserved for them. 


[भाग I—ave 3(i)] 


भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 


(8) 


(9) 


(10) 


Age: No. 


One year for direct recruits 
and promotees. 


50 percent by Composite method 
[i.e. Deputation including short 


603 


Note: Direct Recruits are term contract plus Promotion] 


No. required to — successfully 
complete a mandatory 
induction training of at least 
two weeks duration, as 
prescribed by the competent 
authority, for completion of 
probation. 


Educational Qualification: 


50 percent by Direct Recruitment. 


(11) 
Composite Method [Deputation(including short-term contract) plus Promotion): 
Deputation(including short-term contract): 


Officers under the Central Government or State Governments or Union territory administrations or Statutory or 
Autonomous Organisations or Public Sector Undertakings or Recognised Research Institutions:- 
(A) G) holding analogous post on regular basis in the parent cadre or department; or 
(ii) with two years service in the grade rendered after appointment thereto on a regular basis in posts in level-9 
(Rs. 53100-167800) in the pay matrix or equivalent in the parent cadre or department; or 
(iii) with four years service in the grade rendered after appointment thereto on a regular basis in posts in level-8 
(Rs. 47600-151100) in the pay matrix or equivalent in the parent cadre or department ; or 
(iv) with five years service in the grade rendered after appointment thereto on a regular basis in posts in level-7 
(Rs. 44900- 142400) in pay matrix or equivalent in the parent cadre or department; and 
(B) possessing educational qualification and experience prescribed for direct recruits under column (7). 
Note 1: The departmental Senior Technical Assistant Grade-I (Seeds) in level-7 (Rs. 44500-142400) in pay matrix 
with five years regular service in the grade shall also be considered alongwith outsiders and in case the candidate is 
selected for appointment to the post, the same shall be deemed to have been filled by promotion. 
INote 2: Period of deputation (Including short-term contract) including period of deputation (Including short-term 
contract) in another ex-cadre post held immediately preceding this appointment in the same or some other 
organisation or Department of the Central Government shall ordinarily not to exceed three years. 


Note 3: The maximum age-limit for appointment by deputation (Including short- term contract) shall be not exceeding 
fifty six years as on the closing date of receipt of application. 


(12) (13) 


Consultation with Union Public 
Service Commission is necessary. 


Group ‘A’ Departmental Confirmation Committee (for considering 
confirmation) consisting of: 


1. Joint Secretary, In-charge of Administration Division , 


Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare -Chairman; 
2. Joint Secretary, Incharge of Seeds Division, 

Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare - Member; 
3. Director or Deputy Secretary (Personnel), Department 

of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare —Member. 


[F. No. 12018/03/2018-E.1T] 
UMESH KUMAR SAH, Under Secy. 


नई दिल्‍ली, 11 अगस्त, 2023 


सा.का.नि. 100.--राष्ट्रपति, संविधान के अनुच्छेद 309 के परन्तुक द्वारा प्रदत्त शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हुए और 
कृषि मंत्रालय स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (विशेष श्रेणी), स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (श्रेणी- 1), स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (श्रेणी- 2) और स्टाफ 
कार ड्राइवर (साधारण श्रेणी) नियम, 2014 को, उन बातों के सिवाय अधिक्रांत करते हुए, जिन्हें ऐसे अधिक्रमण से पूर्व 
किया गया है या करने का लोप किया गया है, कृषि और किसान कल्याण मंत्रालय, कृषि और किसान कल्याण विभाग में 


604 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (विशेष श्रेणी), स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (श्रेणी- |), स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (श्रेणी- ॥) और स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर 
(साधारण श्रेणी) के पद पर भर्ती की पद्धति का विनियमन करने के लिए निम्नलिखित नियम बनाती हैं, अर्थात:- 


1. संक्षिप्त नाम और प्रारंभ - (1) इन नियमों का संक्षिप्त नाम कृषि और किसान कल्याण मंत्रालय, कृषि और किसान 
कल्याण विभाग, स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (विशेष श्रेणी), स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (श्रेणी- |), स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (श्रेणी- ॥) और 
स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (साधारण श्रेणी) भर्ती नियम, 2023 है। 


(2) ये राजपत्र में उनके प्रकाशन की तारीख को प्रवृत्त होंगे । 
2. लागू होना - ये नियम इन नियमो से उपाबद्ध अनुसूची के स्तम्भ (1) में विनिर्दिष्ट पदों को लागू होंगे। 
3. पद की संख्या, वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर - उक्त पद की संख्या, उसका वर्गीकरण और इससे संलग्न वेतन 
मैट्रिक्स में स्तर वह होगा जो इन नियमों से उपाबद्ध अनुसूची के स्तंभ (2) से स्तंभ (4) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 
4. भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं, आदि - भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं और उनसे संबंधित अन्य बातें वे 
होंगी जो उक्त अनुसूची के स्तंभ (5) से स्तंभ (13) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 


5. निरहता - वह व्यक्ति - 


(क) जिसने ऐसे व्यक्ति से जिसका पति या जिसकी पत्नी जीवित है, विवाह किया है या विवाह की संविदा की है ; 
या 
(ख) जिसने अपने पति या अपनी पत्नी के जीवित रहते हुए किसी व्यक्ति से विवाह किया है या विवाह की संविदा 
की है, 
उक्त पद पर नियुक्ति का पात्र नहीं होगा: 


परन्तु यदि केन्द्रीय सरकार का यह समाधान हो जाता है कि ऐसा विवाह ऐसे व्यक्ति और विवाह के अन्य पक्षकार 
को लागू cate विधि के अधीन अनुज्ञेय है और ऐसा करने के लिए अन्य आधार हैं तो वह किसी व्यक्ति को इस नियम के 
प्रवर्तन से छूट दे सकेगी । 
6. शिथिल करने की शक्ति -जहां केन्द्रीय सरकार की यह राय है कि ऐसा करना आवश्यक या समीचीन है, वहाँ वह उसके 
लिए जो कारण हैं उन्हें लेखबद्ध करके, और संघ लोक सेवा आयोग से परामर्श करके, इन नियमों के किसी उपबंध को 
किसी वर्ग या प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों की बाबत, आदेश द्वारा शिथिल कर सकेगी । 


7. ब्यावृत्ति-इन नियमों की कोई बात, ऐसे आरक्षण, आयु-सीमा में छूट और अन्य रियायतों पर प्रभाव नहीं डालेगी, 
जिनका केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा इस संबंध में समय-समय पर जारी किए गए आदेशों के अनुसार अनुसूचित जातियों, 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों, अन्य पिछडें वर्गों, भूतपूर्व सैनिकों और अन्य विशेष प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों के लिए उपबंध करना 
अपेक्षित है। 


अनुसूची 
पद का नाम पदों की संख्या वर्गीकरण वेतन मैट्रिक्स में | चयन पद अथवा | सीधे भर्ती किए जाने 
स्तर अचयन पद वाले व्यक्तियों के लिए 
यु-सीमा 
(1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) 

1. स्टाफ कार | 01* (2023) साधारण केन्द्रीय वेतन मैट्रिक्स में TATA | लागू नहीं होता। 
ड्राइवर (विशेष सेवा, समूह ‘a, स्तर-6 
श्रेणी) । “(कार्यभार के आधार | अराजपत्रित (35400 - 

पर परिवर्तन किया जा | अननुसचिवीय। 112400 रू.) | 

सकता है) | 


[भाग I—arve 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 605 
सीधे भर्ती किए जाने वाले | सीधे भर्ती किए जाने वाले | परिवीक्षा की अवधि, | भर्ती की पध्दति, भर्ती सीधे होगी या 
व्यक्तियों के लिए अपेक्षित । व्यक्तियों के लिए विहित आयु और | यदि कोई हो । प्रोन्नति द्वारा या प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन 
शैक्षिक और अन्य अर्हताएं। | शैक्षिक अरहताएं, प्रोन्नत व्यक्तियों द्वारा तथा विभिन्न पध्दतियों द्वारा भरी 
की दशा में लागू होंगी या नहीं । जाने वाली रिक्तियों की प्रतिशतता | 
(7) (8) (9) (10) 
लागू नहीं होता | लागू नहीं होता | दो वर्ष | प्रोन्नति द्वारा | 
प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन द्वारा भर्ती की | यदि विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति है, तो उसकी संरचना | | भर्ती करने में किन 
दशा में वे श्रेणियां जिनसे प्रोन्नति या परिस्थितियों में संघ 
प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन किया जाएगा। लोक सेवा आयोग से 
परामर्श किया जाएगा। 
(11) (12) (13) 
प्रोन्नति:- समूह 'ख' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति के संबंध | संघ लोक सेवा आयोग 
वेतन मैट्रिक्स के स्‍तर - 5 (29200 - 92300 | में विचार करने के लिए) जिसमें निम्नलिखित होंगे: | से परामर्श करना 
रू.) में के ऐसे स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (AHI) | 1. निदेशक या उप सचिव (कार्मिक), कृषि और किसान | आवश्यक नहीं है। 
जिन्होंने नियमित आधार पर नियुक्ति के पश्चात | कल्याण विभाग - अध्यक्ष 
उस श्रेणी में तीन वर्ष की नियमित सेवा की हो। | 2. अवर सचिव (कार्मिक), कृषि और किसान कल्याण 
टिप्पण: जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में | विभाग - सदस्य 
जिन्होंने अपनी अ्ईक या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर | 3. अवर सचिव (सामान्य प्रशासन), कृषि और किसान 
ली है, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार किया जा रहा हो, | कल्याण विभाग - सदस्य 
वहां उनके ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी विचार 
किया जाएगा परंतु यह तब जब कि उनके द्वारा 
की गई ऐसी अक या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित 
Heh या पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक से या दो 
वर्ष से, इनमें से जो भी कम हो, कम न हो और 
उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित जिन्होंने 
ऐसी Hew या पात्रता सेवा पहले की पूरी कर ली 
है, अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी 
परिवीक्षा की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली 
हो। 
(1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) 
2. स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर | 4* (2023) साधारण केन्द्रीय | वेतन मैट्रिक्स में | अचयन। लागू नहीं होता। 
(श्ेणी-।) । *कार्यभार के | सेवा, समूह ग', [स्तर - 5 
आधार पर | अराजपत्रित (29200 - 
परिवर्तन किया जा | अननुसचिवीय 92300 रू.) | 
सकता है। 
(7) (8) (9) (10) 
लागू नहीं होता | लागू नहीं होता | लागू नहीं होता | प्रोन्नति द्वारा। 
(11) (12) (13) 
प्रोन्नति:- समूह “ग' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति | संघ लोक सेवा आयोग 
वेतन मैट्रिक्स के स्‍तर - 4 (25500 - 81100 रू.) में के ऐसे स्टाफ | (प्रोन्नति के संबंध में विचार करने के | से परामर्श करना 


606 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945... [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 
कार ड्राइवर (श्रेणी-॥) जिन्होंने नियमित आधार पर नियुक्ति के | लिए) जिसमें निम्नलिखित att :- | आवश्यक नहीं है। 
पश्चात उस श्रेणी में छह वर्ष की नियमित सेवा की हो या स्टाफ कार | 1. निदेशक या उप सचिव 
ड्राइवर (श्रेणी-]) और स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (सामान्य श्रेणी) में (कार्मिक), कृषि और किसान 
मिलाकर संयुक्त रूप से पंद्रह वर्ष की सेवा की हो । कल्याण विभाग - अध्यक्ष 
टिप्पण 1: जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में जिन्होंने अपनी अर्हक | 2. अवर सचिव (कार्मिक), 
या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली है, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार किया जा रहा कृषि और किसान कल्याण 
हो, वहां उनके ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी विचार किया जाएगा विभाग - सदस्य 
परंतु यह तब जब कि उनके द्वारा की गई ऐसी SH या पात्रता सेवा, | 3. अवर सचिव (सामान्य प्रशासन), 
अपेक्षित wen या पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक से या दो वर्ष से, कृषि और किसान कल्याण 
इनमें से जो भी कम हो, कम न हो और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ विभाग - सदस्य 
व्यक्तियों सहित जिन्होंने ऐसी अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा पहले की पूरी 
कर ली है, अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा 
की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली हो । 
टिप्पण 2: अभ्यर्थियों को पद के लिए विहित व्यवसाय परीक्षण पास 
करना आवश्यक है। 
टिप्पण 3: पोषक पद के पदधारी अर्थात इन संशोधन भर्ती नियम की 
अधिसूचना की तारीख पर नियमित आधार पर स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर 
(श्रेणी-॥) के लिए, सा.का.नि. 186 तारीख 01.09.2014 द्वारा स्टाफ 
कार ड्राइवर (श्रेणी-)) के पद के लिए अधिसूचित भर्ती नियम में 
विहित विद्यमान पात्रता सेवा लागू होगी। 
(1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (0) 
3. स्टाफ कार 6* (2023) साधारण केन्द्रीय. | वेतन मैट्रिक्स में अचयन | लागू नहीं होता। 
ड्राइवर (श्रेणी-॥) | सेवा, समूह ‘TW, स्तर-4 
*(कार्यभार के आधार अराजपत्रित (25500 - 
पर परिवर्तन किया | अननुसचिवीय | 81100 रू.) | 
जा सकता है) | 
(7) (8) (9) (10) 
लागू नहीं होता | लागू नहीं होता | लागू नहीं होता | प्रोन्नति द्वारा | 
(11) (12) (13) 

प्रोन्नति:- समूह “ग' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति | संघ लोक सेवा आयोग से 


वेतन मैट्रिक्स के स्‍तर - 2) 19900 - 63200 रू (में के ऐसे 
स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (सामान्य श्रेणी) जिन्होंने नियमित आधार 


(प्रोन्नति के संबंध में विचार करने के 
लिए) जिसमें निम्नलिखित होंगे-: 


पर नियुक्ति के पश्चात उस श्रेणी में नौ वर्ष की नियमित सेवा 
की ST | 

टिप्पण :जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में जिन्होंने अपनी 
HEH या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली है, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार 
किया जा रहा हो, वहां उनके ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी 
विचार किया जाएगा परंतु यह तब जब कि उनके द्वारा की गई 
ऐसी अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित ASH या पात्रता सेवा के 
आधे से अधिक से या दो वर्ष से, इनमें से जो भी कम हो, कम 
न हो और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित जिन्होंने 
ऐसी अहक या पात्रता सेवा पहले की पूरी कर ली है, अगली 
उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा की अवधि 
सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली ST | 


1. 


oO 


. अवर सचिव (कार्मिक), कृषि और 


. अवर सचिव (सामान्य प्रशासन), 


निदेशक या उप सचिव (कार्मिक), 
कृषि और किसान कल्याण विभाग 
-अध्यक्ष 


कल्याण विभाग 
- सदस्य 


किसान 


कृषि और किसान कल्याण विभाग 
- सदस्य 


परामर्श करना आवश्यक 


नहीं है। 


[भाग 1--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 607 
टिप्पण 2: अभ्यर्थियों को पदों के लिए विहित व्यवसाय 
परीक्षण पास करना आवश्यक है। 
टिप्पण 3: पोषक पद के पदधारी अर्थात इन संशोधन भर्ती 
नियम की अधिसूचना की तारीख पर नियमित आधार पर 
स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (सामान्य श्रेणी) के लिए, सा.का.नि. 186 
तारीख 01.09.2014 द्वारा स्टाफ कार ड्राइवर (श्रेणी-॥) के 
पद के लिए अधिसूचित भर्ती नियम में विहित विद्यमान 
पात्रता सेवा लागू होगी। 
(1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) 
4. स्टाफ कार | 5* (2023) साधारण केन्द्रीय. | वेतन मैट्रिक्स में | लागू नहीं 18 - 27 वर्ष 
ड्राइवर (सामान्य | “(कार्यभार के | सेवा, समूह 'ग', | स्तर - 2 (19900 - | होता। (केंद्रीय सरकार द्वारा 
श्रेणी) । आधार पर | अराजपत्रित 63200 रू.) । जारी किये गए अनुदेशों 
परिवर्तन किया | अननुसचिवीय । या आदेशों के अनुसार 
जा सकता है) | शासकीय सेवको के लिए 
शिथिल करके चालीस 
वर्ष तक की जा सकती 
है)। 
टिप्पण : आयु सीमा- 
अवधारित करने के लिए 
निर्णायक तारीख भारत 
में अभ्यर्थियों से आवेदन 
प्राप्त करने के लिए नियत 
की गयी अंतिम तारीख 
होगी 
है (उनसे भिन्न जो 
अंदमान और निकोबार 
द्वीप और लक्षदीप में है) 
(7) (8) (9) (10) 
आवश्यक: लागू नहीं होता । दो वर्ष | प्रतिनियुक्ति आमेलन / जिसके न हो 
(i) मेट्रीकुलेशन सकने पर सीधे भर्ती द्वारा। 
(ii) मोटरकार के लिए कोई विधिमान्य सशस्त्र बल कार्मिक के लिए: 
चालन अनुज्ञप्ति रखता हो; प्रतिनियुक्ति पुन: नियोजन ॥ 


(ii) यथास्थिति मोटर क्रियाविधि का 
ज्ञान, और यान में मामूली खराबी दूर 
करने योग्य होना चाहिए; 

(iv) किसी मोटर कार के चालन का कम से 
कम तीन वर्ष का अनुभव; 

वांछनीय: 

होम गार्ड या नागरिक स्वयंसेवी के रूप में 

तीन वर्ष की सेवा | 

टिप्पण 1: अनुभव संबंधी अर्हता सक्षम 

प्राधिकारी के विवेकानुसार शिथिल की जा 

सकती हैं | 

टिप्पण 2: अनुसूचित जातियों या 

अनुसूचित जनजातियों के अभ्यर्थियों की 


608 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


दशा में, चयन के किसी चरण पर यदि 
सक्षम प्राधिकारी की राय है कि उनके लिए 
आरक्षित रिक्तियों को भरने के लिए 
अपेक्षित अनुभव रखने वाले उन समुदायों 
के अभ्यर्थियों के पर्याप्त संख्या में उपलब्ध 
होने की सम्भावना नहीं है। 


(11) (12) (13) 


प्रतिनियुक्तिआमेलन : कृषि और किसान कल्याण | समूह “ग' विभागीय पुष्टि aia समूह “ग' | संघ लोक सेवा आयोग 
मंत्रालय, जिसके अंतर्गत उनके अपने संलग्न और | विभागीय चयन समिति :- से परामर्श करना 
अधीनस्थ कार्यालय भी है, में ऐसे नियमित सवार आवश्यक नहीं है। 
हरकारा या तिपहिया स्कूटर ड्राइवर में से जो वेतन 
मैट्रिक्स में स्‍्तर-1 (18000 - 56900/-) रखते हो 
जिसके न हो सकने पर ऐसे नियमित आधार पर सवार | 2. अवर सचिव (कार्मिक), कृषि और किसान 
हरकारा पद धारण करने वाले या केंद्रीय सरकार के कल्याण विभाग -_ सदस्य 

अन्य मंत्रालयों के समूह 'ग' पद धारण करने वाले | 3, अवर सचिव (सामान्य प्रशासन), कृषि और 
कर्मचारियों में से कर्मचारी में से जो मोटरकार चालन किसान कल्याण विभाग - सदस्य 

के सक्षमता के निर्धारण के लिए मोटर चालन परिक्षण 
के आधार पर, मोटरकार चालन की विधिमान्य 
अनुज्ञप्ति रखता हो और जो स्तम्भ (7) में यथावर्णित 
आवश्यक ASAT पूरी करता हो | 


प्रतिनियुक्ति / पुन: नियोजन.- सशस्त्र बल के कार्मिक के 
लिए सशस्त्र बल के ऐसे कार्मिको के सम्बन्ध में भी 
विचार किया जायेगा जो एक वर्ष की अवधि के भीतर 
सेवानिवृत्त होने वाले है या रिज़र्व में स्थानांतरित किये 
जाने वाले है और जिनके पास सीधी भर्ती किये जाने 
वाले व्यक्तियों के लिए स्तम्भ (7) में विहित अर्हताए 
और अनुभव है और जिनकी सिफारिस पुनर्वास 
महानिदेशक, रक्षा मंत्रालय द्वारा की गयी है, और ऐसे 
व्यक्तियों को उस तारीख तक प्रतिनियुक्ति के निबंधनों 
पर रखा जायेगा जिस तारीख से उन्हें सशस्त्र बल से 
निर्मुक्त किया जाना है; और तत्पश्चात उन्हें पुनः 
नियोजन पर बने रहने दिया जा सकता है। 

टिप्पण 1: प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि, जिसके अंतर्गत 
केन्द्रीय सरकार के उसी या किसी अन्य संगठन या 
विभाग में इस नियुक्ति से ठीक पहले धारित किसी 
अन्य काडर बाह्यू पद पर प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि है 
साधारणतया तीन वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी । 


टिप्पण 2: प्रतिनियुक्ति/ आमेलन द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए 
अधिकतम आयु सीमा आवेदन प्राप्त करने की अंतिम 
तारीख को छप्पन वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी । 


1. निदेशक या उप सचिव (कार्मिक), कृषि और 
किसान कल्याण विभाग- अध्यक्ष 


[फा. सं. ए-12018/2/2022- स्था.।।] 


उमेश कुमार साह, अवर सचिव 


[भाग 1--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 609 


New Delhi, the 110 August, 2023 
G.S.R. 100.—In exercise of the powers conferred by the proviso to article 309 of the Constitution and in 

supersession of the Ministry of Agriculture, Department of Agriculture and Cooperation, Staff Car Driver (Special 
Grade), Staff Car Driver (Grade-I) and Staff Car Driver (Grade-II) and Staff Car Driver (Ordinary Grade) Rules, 
2014, except as respects things done or omitted to be done before such supersession, the President hereby makes the 
following rules regulating the method of recruitment to the post of Staff Car Driver (Special Grade), Staff Car Driver 
(Grade-I), Staff Car Driver (Grade-II) and Staff Car Driver (Ordinary Grade) in the Department of Agriculture and 
Farmers Welfare, Ministry of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare, namely:- 
1. Short title and commencement.—(1) These rules may be called the Ministry of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare, 

Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare, Staff Car Driver (Special Grade), Staff Car Driver (Grade-I), 

Staff Car Driver (Grade-II) and Staff Car Driver (Ordinary Grade) Recruitment Rules, 2023. 

(2) They shall come into force on the date of their publication in the Official Gazette. 
2. Application.— These rules shall apply to the posts specified in column (1) of the Schedule annexed to these rules. 


3. Number of post, classification and level in pay matrix.—The number of said post, its classification, level in pay 
matrix relating thereto, shall be as specified in columns (2) to (4) of the Schedule annexed to these rules. 
4. Method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications, etc——The method of recruitment, age-limit, qualification and 
other matters relating thereto shall be as specified in columns (5) to (13) of the said Schedule. 
5. Disqualification.— No person,— 
(a) who has entered into or contracted a marriage with the person having a spouse living ; or 
(b) who, having a spouse living, has entered into or contracted a marriage with any other person, 
Shall be eligible for appointment to the said post: 
Provided that the Central Government may, if satisfied that such marriage is permissible under the personal 


law applicable to such person and the other party to the marriage and that there are other grounds for so doing, exempt 
any person from the operation of this rule. 


6. Power to relax.—Where the Central Government is of the opinion that it is necessary or expedient so to do, it may, 
by order, for reasons to be recorded in writing, and in consultation with the Union Public Service Commission, 
relax any of the provisions of these rules with respect to any class or category of persons. 

7. Saving.—Nothing in these rules shall affect reservation, relaxation of age-limit and other concessions required to 
be provided for the Scheduled Castes, the Scheduled Tribes, the Other Backward classes, the ex-Servicemen and 
other special categories of persons, in accordance with the orders issued by the Central Government from time to 
time in this regard. 

SCHEDULE 


Level in pay 
matrix. 


or non- 
selection post. 


1. Staff Car Driver General Central 
(Special Grade). Service, Group (Rs. 35400- 
iati ‘B’, Non- 112400). 
Gazetted, Non- 
ministerial. 


Educational and other Whether age and Period of probation, if any.| Method of recruitment: 
qualifications required for| educational qualifications Whether by direct 
direct recruits. prescribed for direct recruitment or by promotion 
recruits will apply in the or by deputation/absorption 
case of promotes. and percentage of the 
vacancies to be filled by 
various methods. 


In case of recruitment by promotion or deputation/absorption, grades from which promotion or 
deputation/absorption to be made. 


610 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


(11) 


Promotion:- 


Staff Car Driver (Grade-I), in level-5 (Rs. 29200-92300) in the pay matrix with three years regular service in the grade 
rendered after appointment on a regular basis. 


Note: Where juniors who have completed their qualifying or eligibility service are being considered for promotion, 
their seniors would also be considered provided they are not short of the requisite qualifying or eligibility service by 
more than half of such qualifying or eligibility service or two year, whichever is less, and have successfully completed 
their probation period for promotion to the next higher grade along with their juniors who have already completed 
such qualifying or eligibility service. 


If a Department Promotion Committee exists, what is its Circumstances in which Union Public Service 
composition. Commission is to be consulted in making 
recruitment. 
(12) (13) 
Group ‘B’ Department Promotion Committee (for/Consultation with Union Public Service Commission 
considering promotion) consisting of:- 15 not necessary. 


(1) Director or Deputy Secretary (Personnel), Department o 
Agriculture and Farmers Welfare — Chairman; 

(2) Under Secretary (Personnel), Department of Agriculture 
and Farmers Welfare — Member; 

(3) Under Secretary (General Administration), Department of| 
Agriculture and Farmers Welfare — Member. 


(1) (3) 
2. Staff Car 4 (2023) General Central Level-5 Non- Selection. | Not applicable. 
Driver *(Subject to Service, Group | (Rs. 29200-92300). 
(Grade-I). variation dependent “C’, Non- 
on workload). Gazetted, Non- 
ministerial. 


Not applicable. Not applicable. Not applicable. 


Promotion:- 


Staff Car Driver (Grade-II), in level-4 (Rs. 25500-81100) in the pay matrix with “six years regular service in the grade 
lor a combined service of fifteen years in Staff Car Driver (Grade-II) and in Staff Car Driver (Ordinary Grade) put 
together rendered after appointment on a regular basis. 


Note 1: Where juniors who have completed their qualifying or eligibility service are being considered for promotion, 
their seniors would also be considered provided they are not short of the requisite qualifying or eligibility service by 
more than half of such qualifying or eligibility service or two year, whichever is less, and have successfully completed 
their probation period for promotion to the next higher grade along with their juniors who have already completed 
such qualifying or eligibility service. 


Note 2: Candidates are required to pass Trade Test prescribed for the post. 


Note 3: For the officials holding the feeder post i.e. Staff Car Driver (Grade-II) on regular basis, as on date o 
notification of these amended Recruitment Rules, existing eligibility service prescribed in RRs for the post of Staf 
(Car Driver (Grade-I) notified vide G.S.R. 186 dated 01.09.2014 would be applicable. 


(12) (13) 
Group ‘C’ Department Promotion Committee (for|Consultation with Union Public Service Commission is 


[भाग II—are 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 611 


considering promotion) consisting of:- 1101 necessary. 
(1) Director or Deputy Secretary (Personnel), Department of 
Agriculture and Farmers Welfare — Chairman; 

(2) Under Secretary (Personnel), Department of Agriculture 
and Farmers Welfare — Member; 

(3) Under Secretary (General Administration), Department of| 
Agriculture and Farmers Welfare — Member. 


3. Staff Car Driver 6 (2023) General Central Non-Selection. Not applicable. 
(Grade-II). *(Subject to Service, Group |(Rs. 25500-81100). 
variation ‘C’, Non-Gazetted, 
dependent on Non-ministerial. 
workload). 


Promotion:- 


Staff Car Driver (Ordinary Grade), in level-2 (Rs. 19900-63200) in the pay matrix with nine years regular service 
in the grade rendered after appointment on a regular basis. 


Note 1: Where juniors who have completed their qualifying or eligibility service are being considered for 
promotion, their seniors would also be considered provided they are not short of the requisite qualifying or 
eligibility service by more than half of such qualifying or eligibility service or two year, whichever is less, and 
have successfully completed their probation period for promotion to the next higher grade along with their juniors 
who have already completed such qualifying or eligibility service. 


Note 2: Candidates are required to pass Trade Test prescribed for the post. 


Note 3: For the officials holding the feeder post i.e. Staff Car Driver (Ordinary Grade) on regular basis, as on date 
of notification of these amended Recruitment Rules, existing eligibility service prescribed in RRs for the post of 
Staff Car Driver (Grade-ID notified vide G.S.R. 186 dated 01.09.2014 would be applicable. 


(12) (13) 
Group ‘C’ Department Promotion Committee (for | Consultation with Union Public Service Commission 
considering promotion) consisting of:- is not necessary. 


(1) Director or Deputy Secretary (Personnel), 

Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare 
— Chairman; 

(2) Under Secretary (Personnel), Department of 


Agriculture and Farmers Welfare — Member; 


(3) Under Secretary (General Administration), 
Department of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare 
— Member. 


4. Staff Car Driver | 5 (2023) *(Subject to |General Central Service, Level-2 Not applicable 


(Ordinary Grade) | variation dependent on Group ‘C’ Non- (Rs. 19900-63200) 
workload) Gazetted, Non- 
Ministerial 


(6) 


18-27 years. (Relaxable for Government servants up to forty years in accordance with the instructions or orders issued 


612 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


lby the Central Government). 


Note: The crucial date for determining the age limit shall be the closing date of receipt of applications from 
candidates in India (Other than those in Andaman and Nicobar Islands and Lakshadweep). 


(7) 


Essential: 
(i) Matriculation 
(ii) possession of a valid driving license for motor cars; 
(iii) knowledge of motor mechanism as the case may be, and should be able to remove minor defects in vehicle; 


(iv) experience of driving a motor car for at least three years; 


Desirable: 
Three years’ service as Home Guard or Civil Volunteers. 
Note 1: The qualification regarding experience is relaxable at the discretion of the Competent Authority. 


Note 2: In the case of candidates belonging to Scheduled Castes or Scheduled Tribes if at any stage of selection the 
Competent Authority, is of the opinion that the sufficient number of candidates from these communities possessing 
the requisite experience are not likely to be available to fill up the vacancies reserved for them. 


(8) (9) (10) 
Not applicable. Two years. Deputation / absorption failing which 
by direct recruitment. 


For Armed _ Forces Personnel: 
Deputation / Re-employment. 


(11) 


Deputation/Absorption: 


From amongst the regular Despatch Rider or Three wheeler scooter driver holding Group ‘C’ level-1 in the pay matrix! 
(18000-56900/-) in the Ministry of Agriculture and Farmers Welfare including the attached and subordinate offices 
lunder its Departments failing which from officials holding the post of Despatch Rider on regular basis or Group ‘C’ 
employees of other Ministries of the Central Government (including their attached or subordinate offices) who possess 
valid driving license for Motor Cars on the basis of a Driving Test to assess the competence to drive Motor Cars and 
also fulfilling the necessary qualifications as mentioned in column (7). 


Deputation or Re-employment.- For Armed Forces Personnel: 


The Armed Forces Personnel due to retire or who are to be transferred to reserve within a period of one year and 
having the requisite experience and qualifications prescribed under column (7) shall also be considered and such 
persons shall be given deputation terms up to the date on which they are due for release from the Armed Forces, 
thereafter they may be continued on re- employment. 


Note 1: The period of deputation including the period of deputation in another ex-cadre post held immediately, 
preceding this appointment in the same or some other organisation or Department of the Central Government shall 
ordinarily not exceed three years. 


Note 2: The maximum age-limit for appointment by deputation/absorption shall be not exceeding fifty-six years’ as| 
on the closing date of receipt of applications. 


(13) 
Group ‘C’ Departmental Confirmation Committee/ Consultation with Union Public Service Commission is 
Group ‘C’ Departmental Selection Committee: Inot necessary. 
(1) Director of Deputy Secretary, (Personnel), Department of 


Agriculture and Farmers Welfare - Chairman; 
(ii) Under Secretary (Personnel), Department of Agriculture 
and Farmers Welfare — Member; 
(iii) Under Secretary (General Administration) 


[भाग 1--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 613 


Department of Agriculture and Farmers 
Welfare — Member. 


[F. No. A-12018/2/2022-E.1T] 
UMESH KUMAR SAH, Under Secy. 


स्वास्थ्य और परिवार कल्याण मंत्रालय 
नई दिल्‍ली, 7 अगस्त, 2023 
सा.का.नि. 101.--राष्ट्रपति, संविधान के अनुच्छेद 309 के परन्तुक द्वारा प्रदत्त शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हुए और 
ग्रामीण स्वास्थ्य प्रशिक्षण केंद्र, नज़फगढ़, नई दिल्‍ली (समूह “ग' और “a पद) भर्ती नियम, 1989 को, जहाँ तक उनका 
संबंध ज्येष्ठ सफाई निरीक्षक के पद से है, उन बातों के सिवाय अधिक्रांत करते हुए, जिन्हें ऐसे अधिक्रमण से पूर्व किया गया 
है या करने का लोप किया गया है, ग्रामीण स्वास्थ्य प्रशिक्षण केंद्र, नज़फगढ़, नई दिल्‍ली में ज्येष्ठ सफाई निरीक्षक के पद पर 
भर्ती की पद्धति का विनियमन करने के लिए निम्नलिखित नियम बनाते हैं, अर्थात:- 


1. संक्षिप्त नाम और प्रारंभ-(1) इन नियमों का संक्षिप्त नाम स्वास्थ्य और परिवार कल्याण मंत्रालय, ग्रामीण स्वास्थ्य 
प्रशिक्षण केंद्र, नज़फगढ़, नई दिल्‍ली, ज्येष्ठ सफाई निरीक्षक (समूह 'ग' पद) भर्ती नियम, 2023 = | 


(2) ये राजपत्र में उनके प्रकाशन की तारीख को प्रवृत्त होंगे । 
2. पद की संख्या, वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर- उक्त पद की संख्या, उसका वर्गीकरण और उससे संलग्न वेतन 
मैट्रिक्स में स्तर वह होगा जो इन नियमों से उपाबद्ध अनुसूची के स्तंभ (2) से स्तंभ(4) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 
3. भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं, आदि- उक्त पद पर भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं और उससे 
संबंधित अन्य बातें वे होंगी जो उक्त अनुसूची के स्तंभ (5) से स्तंभ(13) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं | 
4. निरहता: वह व्यक्ति- 
(क) जिसने ऐसे व्यक्ति से, जिसका पति या जिसकी पत्नी जीवित है, विवाह किया है या विवाह की संविदा की 
है; या 
(ख) जिसने अपने पति या अपनी पत्नी के जीवित रहते हुए, किसी व्यक्ति से विवाह किया है या विवाह की 
संविदा की है; 
उक्त पद पर नियुक्ति का पात्र नहीं होगा: 
परंतु यदि केन्द्रीय सरकार का यह समाधान हो जाता है कि ऐसा विवाह उस व्यक्ति और विवाह के अन्य पक्षकार 


को लागू cate विधि के अधीन अनुज्ञेय है और ऐसा करने के लिए अन्य आधार हैं, तो वह किसी व्यक्ति को इस नियम के 
प्रवर्तन से छूट दे सकेगी। 


5. शिथिल करने की शक्ति - जहां केन्द्रीय सरकार की यह राय है कि ऐसा करना आवश्यक या समीचीन है, वहां वह 
उसके लिए जो कारण हैं उन्हें लेखबद्ध करके, इन नियमों के किसी उपबंध को किसी वर्ग या प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों की 
बाबत, आदेश द्वारा शिथिल कर सकेगी । 


6. व्यावृत्ति - इन नियमों की कोई बात ऐसे आरक्षण, आयु-सीमा में छूट और अन्य रियायतों पर प्रभाव नहीं डालेगी, 
जिनका केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा इस संबंध में समय-समय पर जारी किए गए आदेशों के अनुसार अनुसूचित जातियों, 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों, अन्य पिछड़े वर्गों, भूतपूर्व सैनिकों और अन्य विशेष प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों के लिए उपबंध करना 
अपेक्षित है | 


अनुसूची 
पद का नाम पद की संख्या वर्गीकरण वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर 
(1) (2) (3) (4) 
ज्येष्ठ सफाई निरीक्षक । 02°(2023) साधारण केन्‌द्रीय सेवा, वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर-5 
“(कार्यभार के आधार पर परिवर्तन समूह 'ग', अराजपत्रित, (29200-92300 रुपये) | 
किया जा सकता है) | अननुसचिवीय | 


चयन या अचयन पद | | सीधी भर्ती किए जाने | सीधी भर्ती किए जाने वाले सीधी भर्ती किए जाने वाले व्यक्तियों के लिए 
वाले व्यक्तियों के लिए | व्यक्तियों के लिए अपेक्षित विहित आयु और शैक्षिक अरहताएं प्रोन्नत 


614 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


आयु-सीमा | शैक्षिक और अन्य ATA | व्यक्तियों की दशा में लागू होंगी या नहीं । 
(5) (6) (7) (8) 
अचयन। लागू नहीं होता । लागू नहीं होता । लागू नहीं होता । 


परिवीक्षा की | भर्ती की पद्धति, भर्ती सीधी होगी या प्रोन्नति | प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन द्वारा भर्ती की दशा में वे श्रेणियां 


अवधि, यदि द्वारा या प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन द्वारा तथा जिनसे प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन किया जाएगा | 
कोई हो | विभिन्न पद्धतियों द्वारा भरी जाने वाली 
रिक्तियों की प्रतिशतता | 
(9) (10) (11) 
लागू नहीं होता। प्रोन्नति द्वारा। सफाई निरीक्षक में से प्रोन्नति, जिन्होंने वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर-4 


(25500-81100 रुपये) में पाँच वर्ष नियमित सेवा की है। 

टिप्पण: जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में, जिन्होंने अपनी 
अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली है, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार 
किया जा रहा हो, वहां उनके ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी 
विचार किया जाएगा, परंतु यह तब जब कि उसके द्वारा की गई 
ऐसी sem या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा के 
आधे से अधिक से या दो वर्ष से, इनमें से जो भी कम हो, कम न 
हो और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी 
Heh या पात्रता सेवा पहले ही पूरी कर ली है, अगली उच्चतर 
श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा की अवधि 


सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली हो | 
यदि विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति है, तो उसकी संरचना । भर्ती करने में किन परिस्थितियों में 
संघ लोक सेवा आयोग से परामर्श 
किया जाएगा। 
(12) (13) 
समूह “ग' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति पर विचार करने के लिए) जो निम्नलिखित से लागू नहीं होता। 
मिलकर बनेगी:- 
1. निदेशक, ग्रामीण स्वास्थ्य प्रशिक्षण केंद्र, नजफ़गढ़ - अध्यक्ष; 
2. स्वास्थ्य सेवा महानिदेशालय में उपनिदेशक (संबंधित) - सदस्य; 
3. प्रशासनिक अधिकारी, ग्रामीण स्वास्थ्य प्रशिक्षण केंद्र, TTS = - सदस्य। 


[फा. सं. ए.12018/14/2015-एमएच-ा] 


अनुराधा रामकृष्णन, अवर सचिव 


MINISTRY OF HEALTH AND FAMILY WELFARE 
New Delhi, the 7th August, 2023 


G.S.R. 101.—In exercise of the powers conferred by the proviso to article 309 of the Constitution and in 
supersession of the Rural Health Training Centre, Najafgarh, New Delhi (Group ‘C’ and ‘D’ posts), Recruitment 
Rules, 1989, in so far as they relate to the post of Senior Sanitary Inspector, except as respects things done or 
omitted to be done before such supersession, the President hereby makes the following rules regulating the method of 
recruitment to the post of Senior Sanitary Inspector, in the Rural Health Training Centre, Najafgarh, New Delhi, 
namely:— 


1. Short title and commencement. - (1) These rules may be called the Ministry of Health and Family Welfare, Rural 
Health Training Centre, Najafgarh, New Delhi, Senior Sanitary Inspector (Group ‘C’ Post) Recruitment Rules, 
2023. 


[भाग 1--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 615 


(2) They shall come into force on the date of their publication in the Official Gazette. 


2. Number of post, classification and level in pay matrix. — The number of the said post, its classification and level in 
the pay matrix attached thereto shall be as specified in columns (2) to (4) of the Schedule annexed to these rules. 

3. Method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications, etc. - The method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications and 
other matters relating to the said post shall be as specified in columns (5) to (13) of the said Schedule. 

4. Disqualification.— No person, — 

(a) who has entered into or contracted a marriage with a person having a spouse living; or 
(b) who, having a spouse living, has entered into or contracted a marriage with any person, 

shall be eligible for appointment to the said post: 

Provided that the Central Government may, if satisfied that such marriage is permissible under the personal 
law applicable to such person and the other party to the marriage and that there are other grounds for so doing, 
exempt any person from the operationof this rule. 

5. Power to relax. — Where the Central Government is of the opinion that it is necessary or expedient so to do, it 
may, by order and for reasons to be recorded in writing and relax any of the provisions of these rules with respect 
to any class or category of persons. 

6. Saving. — Nothing in these rules shall affect reservation, relaxation of age-limit and other concessions required to 
be provided for the Scheduled Castes, the Scheduled Tribes, the Other Backward Classes, the Ex-servicemen and 


other special categories of persons in accordance with the orders issued by the Central Government from time to 
time in this regard. 


SCHEDULE 


Name of post Number of post Classification Level in pay matrix 


Senior Sanitary (027 (2023) 
Inspector. *(Subject to variation (Gazetted, Non-Ministerial. 
dependent on workload). 


Whether selection Age-limit Educational and other Whether age and educational 
postor non-selection for qualifications required qualifications prescribed for direct 
post direct fordirect recruits recruits will apply in the case of 
recruits promotees 


Non-selection Not applicable Not applicable Not applicable 


Period of Method of recruitment,whether by In case of recruitment by promotion or by 
probation, direct recruitment or by deputation/ absorption, grade from which promotion 
ifany. promotion or by deputation / or deputation/ absorption is to be made. 
absorption and percentage of the 
vacancies to be filled by various 


methods. 
(9) 
Not By promotion. romotion from Sanitary Inspector with five years regular 
applicable. service in level — 4 in the pay matrix (Rs. 25500-81100). 


1४०९: Where juniors, who have completed their qualifying or 
ligibility service are being considered for promotion, their 
seniors would also be considered provided they are not short! 
f the requisite qualifying or eligibility service by more than 
half of such qualifying or eligibility service or two years, 

hichever is less and have successfully completed their 
robation period for promotion to the next higher grade along 

ith their juniors, who have already completed such 
qualifying or eligibility service. 


616 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


If a Departmental Promotion Committee exists, what is its composition Circumstances 
in which Union 
Public Services 
Commission is 
to be consulted 


in making 
recruitment 
(12) 
Group ‘C’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for considering promotion) consisting of :- Not applicable 


1. Director, Rural Health and Training Centre, Najafgarh — Chairman; 


2. Deputy Director (concerned) in Directorate General of Health Services - Member; 


3. Administrative Officer, Rural Health and Training Centre, Najafgarh — Member. 


[F. No. A.12018/14/2015-MH-I1] 
ANURADHA RAMAKRISHNAN, Under Secy. 


नई दिल्‍ली, 16 अगस्त, 2023 


सा.का.नि. 102.--राष्ट्रपति. संविधान के अनच्छेद 309 के परन्तक द्वारा प्रदत्त शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हए. और 
क्षेत्रीय औषधि परीक्षण प्रयोगशाला. चंडीगढ़ में (प्रयोगशाला सहायक और प्रयोगशाला परिचर) भर्ती नियम. 2003 को. 
उन बातों के सिवाए अधिक्रांत करते au. जिन्हें ऐसे अधिक्रमण से पर्व किया गया है या करने का लोप किया गया है. 
स्वास्थ्य और परिवार कल्याण मंत्रालय. क्षेत्रीय औषधि परीक्षण प्रयोगशाला. चंडीगढ़ में प्रयोगशाला सहायक और 
प्रयोगशाला परिचर के पदों पर भर्ती की पद्धति का विनियमन करने के लिए निम्नलिखित नियम बनाते हैं, अर्थातः- 


1. संक्षिप्त नाम और प्रारंभ-(1) इन नियमों का संक्षिप्त नाम स्वास्थ्य सेवा महानिदेशालय. केन्द्रीय औषधि मानक 
नियंत्रण संगठन. क्षेत्रीय औषधि परीक्षण प्रयोगशाला, चंडीगढ़, प्रयोगशाला सहायक और प्रयोगशाला परिचर (समूह 
“ग' पद) भर्ती नियम, 2023 है। 


(2) ये राजपत्र में उनके प्रकाशन की तारीख को प्रवृत्त होंगे । 
2. लागू होना - ये नियम इन नियमों से उपाबद्ध अनुसूची के स्तंभ (1) में विनिर्दिष्ट पदों पर लागू होंगे। 


3. पदों की संख्या, वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर - स्तर पदों की संख्या, उनका वर्गीकरण और उनसे संलग्न वेतन 
मैट्रिक्स में स्तर वे होंगे जो उक्त अनुसूची के स्तंभ (2) से स्तंभ (4) में यथा विनिर्दिष्ट हैं । 


4. भर्ती की पद्धति, आय-सीमा, अर्हताएं, आदि- उक्त पदों पर भर्ती की पद्धति, आय-सीमा, अर्हताएं और उनसे संबंधित 
अन्य बातें वे होंगी जो उक्त अनुसूची के स्तंभ (5) से स्तंभ (13) में यथा विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 


5. निरहता-वह व्यक्ति- 
(क) जिसने ऐसे व्यक्ति से, जिसका पति या जिसकी पत्नी जीवित है, विवाह किया है या विवाह की संविदा की है; या 


(ख) जिसने अपने पति या अपनी पत्नी के जीवित रहते हुए, किसी व्यक्ति से विवाह किया है या विवाह की संविदा 
की है; 


उक्त पदों पर नियुक्ति का पात्र नहीं होगा: 
परंत्‌ यदि केन्द्रीय सरकार का यह समाधान हो जाता है कि ऐसा विवाह उस व्यक्ति और विवाह के अन्य 


पक्षकार को लागू cate विधि के अधीन अनुज्ञेय है और ऐसा करने के लिए अन्य आधार हैं, तो वह किसी व्यक्ति को 
इस नियम के प्रवर्तन से छूट दे सकेगी । 


6. शिथिल करने की शक्ति - जहाँ केन्द्रीय सरकार की यह राय है कि ऐसा करना आवश्यक या समीचीन है, वहाँ वह उसके 
लिए जो कारण हैं उन्हें लेखबद्ध करके, इन नियमों के किसी उपबंध को किसी वर्ग या प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों की बाबत, 
आदेश द्वारा, शिथिल कर सकेगी। 


[भाग I—ave 3(i)] 


भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 


617 


7. व्यावत्ति - इन नियमों की कोई बात ऐसे आरक्षण, आयू-सीमा में छूट और अन्य रियायतों पर प्रभाव नहीं डालेगी, 
जिनका केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा इस संबंध में समय-समय पर जारी किए गए आदेशों के अनूसार अनूसचित जातियों, 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों, अन्य पिछड़े वर्गों, भूतपूर्व सैनिकों और अन्य विशेष प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों के लिए उपबंध करना 


अपेक्षित है। 
अनुसूची 
पद का नाम पद की संख्या वर्गीकरण वेतन मैट्रिक्स में | चयन या | सीधी भर्ती किए जाने वाले व्यक्तियों 
स्तर अचयन पद के लिए आयु-सीमा 
(1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) 
1. प्रयोगशाला | 02* (2023) साधारण केन्‌द्रीय | वेतन मैट्रिक्स में | लागू नहीं | आयु 18 से 27 वर्ष के बीच 
सहायक | * कार्यभार के सेवा, समूह 'ग', स्तर-3 होता। | (केंद्रीय सरकार द्वारा जारी अनुदेशों 
आधार पर अराजपत्रित, (21700- या आदेशों के अनूसार विभागीय 
परिवर्तन किया जा | अननुसचिवीय। | 69100 रुपये)। अभ्यर्थियों के लिए ऊपरी आय-सीमा 
सकता है। 40 वर्ष की आयु तक शिथिल की जा 
सकती है।) 
टिप्पण 1: आयु-सीमा अवधारित 
करने के लिए निर्णायक तारीख वह 
होगी जो कर्मचारी चयन आयोग द्वारा 
विज्ञापित की जाए। 
सीधी भर्ती किए जाने वाले व्यक्तियों के लिए _| सीधी भर्ती किए जाने वाले | परिवीक्षा की अवधि, भर्ती की पद्धति: भर्ती सीधी 
अपेक्षित शैक्षिक और अन्य अहताएं व्यक्तियों के लिए विहित | यदि कोई हो होगी या प्रोन्नति द्वारा या 
आयु और शैक्षिक अहताएं प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन द्वारा 
प्रोन्नत व्यक्तियों की दशा में तथा विभिन्न पद्धतियों 
लागू होंगी या नहीं द्वारा भरी जाने वाली 
रिक्तियों की प्रतिशतता 
(7) (8) (9) (10) 
(क) आवश्यक : किसी मान्यताप्राप्त बोर्ड से | लागू नहीं होता। सीधी भर्ती किये जाने | () पचास प्रतिशत सीधी 
विज्ञान के साथ 12वीं कक्षा उत्तीर्ण। — eve के लिख भर्ती द्वारा; और 


(ख) वांछनीय: एक विषय के रूप में 
रसायनशास्त्र के साथ विज्ञान विषय में स्नातक। 


टिप्पण 1: अ्हताएँ अन्यथा सुअर्हित अभ्यर्थियों 
की दशा में कर्मचारी चयन आयोग या सक्षम 
प्राधिकारी के विवेकानुसार शिथिल की जा 
सकती है। 

टिप्पण 2: अनुभव संबंधी अर्हताएँ, कर्मचारी 
चयन आयोग या सक्षम प्राधिकारी के 
विवेकानुसार, अनुसूचित जातियों या 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों के अभ्यर्थियों की दशा 
में तब शिथिल की जा सकती हैं, जब चयन के 
किसी प्रक्रम पर कर्मचारी चयन आयोग की यह 
राय है कि उनके लिए आरक्षित रिक्तियों को 
भरने के लिए अपेक्षित अनुभव रखने वाले उन 
समुदायों के अभ्यर्थियों के पर्याप्त संख्या में 


(ii) पचास प्रतिशत प्रोन्नति 
द्वारा। 


टिप्पण: परिवीक्षा को 
सफलतापूर्वक पूरा करने 
के लिए केन्द्रीय सरकार 
द्वारा यथाविहित कम से 
कम दो सप्ताह की 
अवधि का प्रवेश 
प्रशिक्षण पूरा करना 
अनिवार्य होगा। 


618 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 


[PART II—SEc. 3(4)] 


उपलब्ध होने की संभावना नहीं है। 


प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति।आमेलन द्वारा भर्ती की दशा में | यदि विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति है, तो उसकी संरचना | भर्ती करने में 
किन 
ae श्रेणियाँ जिनसे प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति।/आमेलन परिस्थितियों में 
aU) संघ लोक सेवा 
आयोग से 
परामर्श किया 
जाएगा 
(11) (12) (13) 
प्रोन्नति: समूह 'ग' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति के संबंध. | लागू नहीं होता। 
वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर-1 (18000-56900) रुपये में | ” विचार करने के लिए) जो निम्नलिखित से मिलकर 
ऐसे प्रयोगशाला परिचर जिनहोंने छह वर्ष की | बनेगी: 
नियमित सेवा की हो, प्रोन्नति के लिए पात्र होंगे। 1. निदेशक, क्षेत्रीय औषधि परीक्षण प्रयोगशाला, 
टिप्पण : जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में, चंडीगढ़ - अध्यक्ष; 
जिन्होंने अपनी sem या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली है, | 2, उप निदेशक (प्रशासन), केंद्रीय औषधि मानक 
प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार किया जा रहा हो, वहां उसके नियंत्रण संगठन (मुख्यालय), 
ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी विचार किया जाएगा, नई दिल्‍ली _ ager: 
परंतु यह तब जब कि उसके द्वारा की गई ऐसी अर्हक 
या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित ade या पात्रता सेवा के | 3: कोई समूह 'क' अधिकारी क्षेत्रीय औषधि 
आधे से अधिक से या दो वर्ष से, इनमें से जो भी कम परीक्षण प्रयोगशाला, चंडीगढ़ -सदस्या। 
हो, कम न हो और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों | समूह ay विभागीय पुष्टि समिति (पुष्टि के संबंध में 
सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी अर्ईक या पात्रता सेवा पहले ही | विचार करने के लिए) जो निम्नलिखित से मिलकर 
पूरी कर ली है, अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए | बनेगी: 
अपनी परिवीक्षा की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली 
हो। 1. निदेशक, क्षेत्रीय औषधि परीक्षण प्रयोगशाला, 
चंडीगढ़ - अध्यक्ष; 
2. उप निदेशक (प्रशासन), केंद्रीय औषधि मानक 
नियंत्रण संगठन (मुख्यालय), 
नई दिल्‍ली - सदस्य; 
3. कोई समूह 'क' अधिकारी क्षेत्रीय औषधि 
परीक्षण प्रयोगशाला, चंडीगढ़ - सदस्य। 
(1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) 
2. प्रयोगशाला | 02* (दो) (2023) साधारण केन्‌द्रीय | वेतन मैट्रिक्स में ps नहीं | आयु 18 से 27 वर्ष के बीच। 
सेवा, समूह ‘TW, सूतर-1 । 
3303 * कार्यभार के आधार जप ते के (केंद्रीय सरकार द्वारा जारी 
पर परिवर्तन किया Sas (18000-56900/- अनुदेशों या आदेशों के अनुसार 


[भाग II—ave 3(i)] 


भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 


619 


जा सकता है। अननुसचिवीय। रुपये) । विभागीय अभ्यर्थियों के लिए 
ऊपरी आयु-सीमा 40 वर्ष की 
आयु तक शिथिल की जा सकती 
है।) 
टिप्पण 1: आयु-सीमा अवधारित 
करने के लिए निर्णायक तारीख 
वह होगी जो कर्मचारी चयन 
आयोग द्वारा विज्ञापित की जाए। 
(7) (8) (9) (10) 
आवश्यक : किसी मान्यताप्राप्त बोर्ड से विज्ञान के साथ 12वीं | लागू नहीं होता। | सीधी भर्ती किये जाने वाले सीधी भर्ती 
कक्षा उत्तीर्ण। व्यक्तियों के लिए दो वर्ष। द्वारा। 
टिप्पण 1: अहताएँ अन्यथा aaa अभ्यर्थियों की दशा में टिप्पण: परिवीक्षा को 
कर्मचारी चयन आयोग या सक्षम प्राधिकारी के विवेकानुसार सफलतापूर्वक पूरा करने के 
शिथिल की जा सकती है। लिए केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा 
टिप्पण 2: अनुभव संबंधी अर्हताएँ, कर्मचारी चयन आयोग या यथाविहित कम से कम दो 
सक्षम प्राधिकारी के विवेकानुसार, अनुसूचित जातियों या सप्ताह की अवधि का प्रवेश 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों के अभ्यर्थियों की दशा में तब शिथिल प्रशिक्षण पूरा करना अनिवार्य 
की जा सकती हैं, जब चयन के किसी प्रक्रम पर कर्मचारी चयन होगा। 
आयोग की यह राय है कि उनके लिए आरक्षित रिक्तियों को 
भरने के लिए अपेक्षित अनुभव रखने वाले उन समुदायों के 
अभ्यर्थियों के पर्याप्त संख्या में उपलब्ध होने की संभावना नहीं 
है। 
(11) (12) (13) 
लागू नहीं होता। समूह 'ग' विभागीय पृष्टि समिति (पुष्टि के संबंध में विचार करने के लिए) जो लागू नहीं होता। 
निम्नलिखित से मिलकर बनेगी: 
1. निदेशक, क्षेत्रीय औषधि परीक्षण प्रयोगशाला, चंडीगढ़ - अध्यक्ष; 
2. उप निदेशक (प्रशासन), केन्द्रीय औषधि मानक नियंत्रण संगठन, 
नई दिल्‍ली -सदस्य; 
3. कोई समूह 'क' अधिकारी क्षेत्रीय औषधि परीक्षण प्रयोगशाला, 
चंडीगढ़ -सदस्य। 


New Delhi, the 16th August, 2023 


[फा. सं. ए.12018/2/2020-डीआरएस-(भाग-शा।] 


बिकाश आर महतो, अवर सचिव 


G.S.R. 102.—In exercise of the powers conferred by the proviso to article 309 of the Constitution and in 
supersession of the Regional Drugs Testing Laboratory, Chandigarh (Laboratory Assistant and Laboratory Attendant), 
Recruitment Rules, 2003, except as respects things done or omitted to be done before such supersession, the President 
hereby makes the following rules regulating the method of recruitment to the posts of Laboratory Assistant and 


620 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 
Laboratory Attendant in Regional Drugs Testing Laboratory, Chandigarh, Ministry of Health and Family Welfare, 
namely: - 


1. Short title and commencement. - (1) These rules may be called the Directorate General of Health Services, 
Central Drugs Standard Control Organisation, Regional Drugs Testing Laboratory, Chandigarh, Laboratory 
Assistant and Laboratory Attendant (Group 'C' Posts) Recruitment Rules, 2023. 


(2) They shall come into force on the date of their publication in the Official Gazette. 


2. Application. - These rules shall apply to the posts as specified in column (1) of the Schedule annexed to these 
tules. 


3. Number of posts, classifications and level in pay matrix. - The number of the said posts, their classifications and 
level in the pay matrix attached thereto shall be as specified in columns (2) to (4) of the said Schedule. 


4. Method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications, etc.- The method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications and 
other matters relating to the said posts shall be as specified in columns (5) to (13) of the said Schedule. 


5. Disqualification.- No person, - 
(a) who has entered into or contracted a marriage with a person having a spouse living; or 
(b) who, having a spouse living, has entered into or contracted a marriage with any person, 
shall be eligible for appointment to the said posts: 


Provided that the Central Government may, if satisfied that such marriage is permissible under the personal 
law applicable to such persons and the other party to the marriage and that there are other grounds for so doing, 
exempt any person from the operation of this rule. 


6. Power to relax. - Where the Central Government is of the opinion that it is necessary or expedient so to do, it may, 
by order and for reasons to be recorded in writing, relax any of the provisions of these rules with respect to any 
class or category of persons. 


7. Savings. - Nothing in these rules shall affect reservation, relaxation of age-limit and other concessions required to 
be provided for the Scheduled Castes, the Scheduled Tribes, the Other Backward Classes, the Ex- servicemen and 
other special categories of persons in accordance with the orders issued by the Central Government from time to 
time in this regard. 


SCHEDULE 


Name of posts 


1. Laboratory Assistant. 02**(2023) General Central Level-3 in the pay matrix 
*Subject to Service, Group ‘C’, Non- |(Rs. 21700-69100). 
variation dependent on |Gazetted, 
workload. INon-Ministerial. 


Whether selection post or non- Age-limit for direct recruits 
selection post 


Non-selection. Between 18 and 27 years of age. 


(The upper age-limit is relaxable for the departmental candidates upto the age of 
forty years in accordance with the instructions or orders issued by the Central 
Government). 


Note 1: The crucial date for determining the age-limit shall be as advertised by the 
Staff Selection Commission. 


direct recruits. qualifications prescribed for direct 
recruits will apply in the case of 


promotees. 


(7) 


1. Essential: 12" class pass with Science from a recognised Board. Not applicable. 


[भाग II—are 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 621 


+ Desirable: Graduation in Science with Chemistry as one of the 
subject. 


Note 1: Qualifications are relaxable at the discretion of the Stafi 
Selection Commission or competent authority in case of candidates 
otherwise well qualified. 


Note 2: The qualifications regarding experience are relaxable at the 
discretion of the Staff Selection Commission or competent authority in 
the case of candidates belonging to the Scheduled Castes and the 
Scheduled Tribes, if at any stage of selection, the Staff Selection 
(Commission is of the opinion that sufficientnumber of candidates from 
these communitiespossessing the requisite experience is not likely to be 
available to fillup the vacancy reserved for them. 


Period of probation, if any | Method of recruitment whether by | In case of recruitment by promotion or 
direct recruitment or by promotion | by deputation/ absorption, grades from 
or by deputation/ absorption and which promotion or deputation 
percentage of the vacancies to be /absorption to be made 
filled by various methods 


Two years for काट |ifty per cent. by direct recruitment; and | Promotion: 

recruitment. ft oy tj Laboratory Attendant in Level-1 in the pay 
* Paes Van ee Petre cr matrix Rs. (18000-56900) with six years 

Note: here shall be a 


: > ee regular service shall be eligible for 
mandatory induction training 


of at least two weeks duration Deere 

for successful completion of Note: Where juniors, who have completed 

probation as prescribed by the their qualifying or eligibility service are 

Central Government. being considered for promotion, their 
seniors would also be considered provided 
they are not short of the requisite 
qualifying or eligibility service by more 
than half of such qualifying or eligibility 
service, or two years, whichever is less and 
have successfully completed _ their 
probation period for promotion to the next 
higher grade along with their juniors, who 
have already completed such qualifying or 
eligibility service. 


Circumstances in which 
Union Public Services 
Commission is to be 
consulted in making 
recruitment. 


Group ‘C’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for considering promotion) Not applicable. 
consisting of:- 
1. Director, Regional Drugs Testing Laboratory Chandigarh - Chairman; 


2. Deputy Director (Administration) Central Drug Standard Control Organisation 
(Head Quarter), New Delhi - Member; 


3. Any group ‘A’ officer, Regional Drugs Testing Laboratory Chandigarh -Member. 


Group ‘C’ Departmental Confirmation Committee (for considering 
confirmation) consisting of:- 


1. Director, Regional Drugs Testing Laboratory Chandigarh - Chairman; 


2. Deputy Director (Administration) Central Drug Standard Control Organisation 


622 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 


eee | Quarter), New Delhi 


[PART II—SEc. 3(4)] 


- Member; 


3. Any group ‘A’ officer, Regional Drugs Testing Laboratory Chandigarhc - Member. 


(1) (2) 


(3) (4) 


2. Laboratory Attendant. Two*(2023) 


General Central Service, | Level-1 in the pay 


*subject to variation | Group ‘C’, Non- Gazetted, | matrix (Rs. 18000- 
dependent on workload. Non-Ministerial. 56900). 
(5) (6) 
Not applicable. Between 18 and 27 years of age 


(The upper age-limit is relaxable for the departmental 
candidates up to the age of forty years in accordance 
with the instructions or orders issued by the Central 
Government. 


Note : The crucial date for determining the age-limit 
shall be as advertised by the Staff Selection 
Commission. 


(7) 


(8) 


Essential: 127 class pass with science from a recognised Board. 


Note 1: Qualifications are relaxable at the discretion of the Staff Selection 
Commission or competent authority in case of candidates otherwise well qualified. 


Note 2: The qualifications regarding experience are relaxable at the discretion of the 
Staff Selection Commission or competent authority in the case of candidates belonging 
to the Scheduled Castes and the Scheduled Tribes, if at any stage of selection, the Staff 
Service Commission is of the opinion that sufficient number of candidates from these 
communities possessing the requisite experience are not likely to be available to fill up 


the vacancy reserved for them. 


Not applicable. 


(9) 


(10) (11) 


Two years for direct recruitment 


Note : There shall be mandatory induction training of at 
least two weeks duration for successful completion of 


probation as prescribed by the Central Government. 


By direct recruitment. Not applicable. 


(12) 


(13) 


Group ‘C’ Departmental Confirmation Committee (for considering confirmation) 


consisting of: - 


1. Director, Regional Drugs Testing Laboratory Chandigarh-Chairman; 


2. Deputy Director (Administration), Central Drug Standard Control Organisation (Head 


Quarter), New Delhi-Member; 


3. Any Group ‘A’ officer, Regional Drugs Testing Laboratory Chandigarh-Member. 


Not applicable. 


[F. No. A.12018/2/2020-DRS(PART-VIID] 
BIKASH R MAHATO, Under Secy. 


[भाग [—avs 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 623 


उपभोक्ता मामले, खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण मंत्रालय 
(खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण विभाग) 
(भंडारण एवं अनुसंधान प्रभाग) 
नई दिल्‍ली, 11 अगस्त, 2023 
सा.का.नि. 103.--राष्ट्रपति, संविधान के अनुच्छेद 309 के परन्तुक द्वारा प्रदत्त शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हुए और 
भारतीय अनाज भंडारण संस्थान, हापुड़ (अराजपत्रित पद) भर्ती नियम, 1969 को, जहां तक उनका संबंध ज्येष्ठ लिपिक के 
पद से है, उन बातों के सिवाय अधिक्रांत हुए, जिन्हें ऐसे अधिक्रमण से पूर्व किया गया है या करने का लोप किया गया है, 


उपभोक्ता मामले, खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण मंत्रालय, खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण विभाग, भंडारण एवं अनुसंधान 
प्रभाग में ज्येष्ठ लिपिक के पद पर भर्ती की पद्धति का विनियमन करने के लिए निम्नलिखित नियम बनाते हैं, अर्थात्‌ :- 


1. संक्षिप्त नाम और प्रारंभ.-(1) इन नियमों का संक्षिप्त नाम उपभोक्ता मामले, खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण मंत्रालय, 
खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण विभाग, भंडारण एवं अनुसंधान प्रभाग, ज्येष्ठ लिपिक भर्ती नियम, 2023 है। 
(2) ये राजपत्र में उनके प्रकाशन की तारीख को प्रवृत्त होंगे। 

2. पद-संख्या, वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर .- उक्त पदों की संख्या, उनका वर्गीकरण और इससे संलग्न वेतन मैट्रिक्स 
में स्तर वे होंगे, जो इन नियमों से उपाबद्ध अनुसूची के स्तंभ (2) से स्तंभ (4) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 

3. भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं आदि .- भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं और उनसे संबंधित अन्य 
बातें वे होंगी, जो उक्त अनुसूची के स्तंभ (5) से स्तंभ (13) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 

4. निरहता.- वह व्यक्ति - 

(क) जिसने ऐसे व्यक्ति से, जिसका पति या जिसकी पत्नी जीवित है, विवाह किया है या विवाह की संविदा की है; या 


(ख) जिसने अपने पति या अपनी पत्नी के जीवित रहते हुए किसी व्यक्ति से विवाह किया है या विवाह की संविदा की 
है, उक्त पद पर नियुक्ति का पात्र नहीं होगा: 


परन्तु यदि केंद्रीय सरकार का यह समाधान हो जाता है कि ऐसा विवाह ऐसे व्यक्ति और विवाह के अन्य 
पक्षकार को लागू cate विधि के अधीन अनुज्ञेय है और ऐसा करने के लिए अन्य आधार हैं तो वह किसी व्यक्ति को इस 
नियम के प्रवर्तन से छूट दे सकेगी। 


5. शिथिल करने की शक्ति.- जहां केन्द्रीय सरकार की यह राय है कि ऐसा करना आवश्यक या समीचीन है, वहां वह उसके 
लिए जो कारण हैं उन्हें Haag करके, इन नियमों के किसी उपबंध को किसी वर्ग या प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों की बाबत, आदेश 
द्वारा शिथिल कर सकेगी। 

6. व्यावृत्ति.. इन नियमों की कोई बात, ऐसे आरक्षण, आयु-सीमा में छूट और अन्य रियायतों पर प्रभाव नहीं डालेगी, 
जिनका केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा इस संबंध में समय-समय पर जारी किए गए आदेशों के अनुसार अनुसूचित जातियों, 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों, अन्य पिछड़े वर्गों, भूतपूर्व सैनिकों और अन्य विशेष प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों के लिए उपबंध करना 
अपेक्षित है। 

7. संरक्षण.- जहां विद्यमान नियम में विहित प्रोन्नति कि लिए पात्रता सेवा में वृद्धि की जा रही है और जहां ऐसे परिवर्तन से 
उन पदधारियों की प्रोन्नति प्रभावित होने की सम्भावना है, नियमित आधार पर फीडर पद धारण करने वाले पदधारियों 
(राजपत्र में प्रकाशन की तारीख के समय पदधारियों के लिए) के लिए तीन वर्ष की पात्रता सेवा को बनाए रखा जाएगा। 


अनुसूची 


पद का नाम पदों की संख्या वर्गीकरण चयन पद या 
अचयन पद 


3* (2023) साधारण केन्द्रीय सेवा, वेतन मैट्रिक्स स्तर-4 
“(कार्यभार के आधार | समूह TW’, अराजपत्रित, | (25500-81100 रू.) | 
पर परिवर्तन किया जा | अनुसचिवीय | 

सकता है)। 


624 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


अपेक्षित शैक्षिक और अन्य अहताएं | 


fe भर्ती किए जाने वाले व्यक्तियों के लिए विहित आयु और शैक्षिक परिवीक्षा की अवधि, यदि कोई हो | 
अर्हताएं, प्रोन्नत व्यक्तियों की दशा में लागू होंगी या नहीं । 


भर्ती की पद्धति : भर्ती सीधी होगी या प्रोन्नति द्वारा | प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन द्वारा भर्ती की दशा में वे श्रेणियां जिनसे 
या प्रतिनियुक्त/।आमेलन द्वारा | प्रोन्नतिया प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन किया जाएगा। 

तथा विभिन्न पद्धतियों द्वारा भरी जाने वाली 

रिक्तियों की प्रतिशतता। 


प्रोन्नति । पदोन्नतिः वेतन मैट्रिक्स के स्‍्तर-2 (19900-63200 रुपये) में के ऐसे अवर 
श्रेणी लिपिक जिन्होंने आठ वर्ष की नियमित सेवा की हो। 
टिप्पण 1 : इन भर्ती नियमों की अधिसूचना की तारीख पर फीडर श्रेणी 
पद (अवर श्रेणी लिपिक) में पदधारियों के लिए पदोन्नति के लिए sea 
सेवा तीन वर्ष बनी रहेगी। 
टिप्पण 2 : जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में, जिन्होंने अपनी aes या 
पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली है, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार किया जा रहा हो, वहां 
उनसे ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी विचार किया जाएगा परंतु यह तब 
जब कि उनके द्वारा की गई ऐसी अर्ईक या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित अर्ईक या 
पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक से या दो वर्ष से, इनमें से जो भी कम हो, 
कम न हो और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी 
Heh या पात्रता सेवा पहले ही पूरी कर ली है, अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में 
प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली हो। 


यदि विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति है, तो उसकी संरचना भर्ती करने में किन परिस्थितियो में संघ लोक 


सेवा आयोग से परामर्श किया जाएगा। 


समूह 'ग' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति के संबंध में विचार करने के लिए) जिसमें लागू नहीं होता 
निम्नलिखित होंगे:- 

(1) अवर सचिव (ई-3) - अध्यक्ष; 

(2) सहायक निदेशक (भंडारण एवं अनुसंधान) - सदस्य; 

(3) अनुभाग अधिकारी (ई-3/एसआरए) - सदस्य। 


[फा. सं. ए-12018/01/2022-एसआरए (पार्ट-४] 
संगीत कुमार, अवर सचिव 


[भाग तर--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 625 


MINISTRY OF CONSUMER AFFAIRS, FOOD AND PUBLIC DISTRIBUTION 
(Department of Food and Public Distribution) 
(STORAGE AND RESEARCH DIVISION) 
New Delhi, the 11th August, 2023 


G.S.R. 103.—In exercise of the powers conferred by the proviso to article 309 of the Constitution, and in 
supersession of the Indian Grain Storage Institute, Hapur (Non-Gazetted posts) Recruitment Rules, 1969 in so far as it 
relates to the post of Senior Clerk, except as respects things done or omitted to be done before such suppression, the 
President hereby makes the following rules regulating the method of recruitment to the post of Senior Clerk in the 
Ministry of Consumer Affairs, Food and Public Distribution, Department of Food and Public Distribution, Storage & 
Research Division, namely:- 


1. Short title and commencement.- (1) These rules may be called Ministry of Consumer Affairs, Food and Public 
Distribution, Department of Food and Public Distribution, Storage & Research Division, Senior Clerk Recruitment 
Rules, 2023. 


(2) They shall come into force on the date of their publication in the Official Gazette. 


2. Number of posts, classification and level in pay matrix.- The number of said posts, its classification and level in 
the pay matrix attached thereto shall be specified in columns (2) to (4) of the Schedule annexed to these rules. 


3. Method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications, etc.- The method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications and 
other matters relating thereto shall be as specified in the columns (5) to (13) of the aforesaid Schedule. 


4. Disqualification.- No person, — 
(a) who has entered into or contracted a marriage with a person having a spouse living; or 
(b) who, having a spouse living, has entered into or contracted a marriage with any person, 
shall be eligible for appointment to the said post: 


Provided that the Central Government may, if satisfied that such marriage is permissible under the personal 
law applicable to such person and the other party to the marriage and that there are other grounds for doing so, exempt 
any person from the operation of this rule. 


5. Power to relax.- Where the Central Government is of the opinion that it is necessary or expedient so to do, it may, 
by order, and for reasons to be recorded in writing, relax any of the provisions of these rules with respect to any 
class or category or of persons. 


6. Saving. - Nothing in these rules shall affect the reservations, relaxation of age-limit and other concessions required 
to be provided to the Scheduled Castes, the Scheduled Tribes, the Other Backward Classes, the Ex-servicemen and 
other special categories of persons in accordance with the orders issued by the Central Government from time to 
time in this regard. 


7. Protection.- Eligibility service of three years shall be retained for incumbents (for incumbents as on the date of 
publication in the Official Gazette) holding the feeder post on regular basis, where the eligibility service for 
promotion prescribed in the existing rule is being enhanced and where the change is likely to affect the promotions 
of these incumbents. 


SCHEDULE 
Name of Number of Classification Level in pay matrix Whether Age-limit for 
post posts selection post or direct recruits 
non-selection 
post 
(1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) 
Senior 3*(2023) General Central Level-4 in the pay Non-selection. Not applicable. 
Clerk. *Subject to Service, matrix 
variation Group-C, (Rs.25500-81100). 
depending on Non-Gazetted, 
workload. Ministerial. 


626 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 


[PART II—SEc. 3(4)] 


other 
for 


and 
required 


Educational 
qualifications 


direct recruits. case of promotes. 


Whether age and educational qualifications 
prescribed for direct recruits will apply in the 


Period of probation, if 
any. 


(7) 


(8) (9) 


Not applicable. 


Not applicable. 


Not applicable. 


Method of recruitment, whether by _ direct 
recruitment or by promotion or _ by 
deputation/absorption and percentage of the 
vacancies to be filled by various methods. 


In case of recruitment by promotion/deputation/ 
absorption grades from which promotion/deputation/ 
absorption to be made. 


(10) 


(11) 


Promotion. 


Promotion: 


Lower Division Clerk with eight years of regular service in 
pay level-2 in pay matrix (Rs.19900-63200). 


Note 1 : The qualifying service for promotion for the 
incumbents in the feeder grade post (Lower Division Clerk) 
as on the date of notification of these recruitment rules shall 
continue to be three years. 


Note 2 : Where juniors who have completed their qualifying 
or eligibility service are being considered for promotion, 
their seniors would also be considered provided they are not 
short of the requisite qualifying or eligibility service by 
more than half of such qualifying or eligibility service or 
two years, whichever is less, and have successfully 
completed their probation period for promotion to the next 
higher grade alongwith their juniors who have already 
completed such qualifying or eligibility service. 


If a Departmental Promotion Committee exists, what is its 


Circumstances in which Union Public 


composition. Service Commission to be consulted in 
making recruitment. 
(12) (13) 
Group ‘C’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for considering Not Applicable. 


promotion) consisting of: 


(1) Under Secretary (5.11) - Chairperson; 
(2) Assistant Director (Storage & Research) - Member; and 
(3) Section Officer (E.TH/SRA) - Member. 


[F. No. A-12018/01/2022-SRA (Part-V)] 
SANGEET KUMAR, Under 86८५. 


नई दिल्‍ली, 11 अगस्त, 2023 


सा.का.नि.104.--राष्ट्रपति, संविधान के अनुच्छेद 309 के परन्तुक द्वारा प्रदत्त शक्तियों काप्रयोग करते हुए और 
उपभोक्ता मामले, खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण मंत्रालय, खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण विभाग, भंडारण एवं अनुसंधान 
प्रभाग, बहुकार्य कर्मचारी वृंद (एमटीएस) भर्ती नियम, 2016 को, उन बातों के सिवाय अधिक्रांत करते हुए, जिन्हें ऐसे 
अधिक्रमण से पूर्व किया गया है या करने का लोप किया गया है, उपभोक्ता मामले, खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण मंत्रालय, 
खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण विभाग, भंडारण एवं अनुसंधान प्रभाग में बहुकार्य कर्मचारी वृंद के पद पर भर्ती की पद्धति का 
विनियमन करने के लिए निम्नलिखित नियम बनाते हैं, अर्थात्‌ :- 


1. संक्षिप्त नाम और प्रारंभ.- (1) इन नियमों का संक्षिप्त नाम उपभोक्ता मामले, खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण 
मंत्रालय, खाद्य और सार्वजनिक वितरण विभाग, भंडारण एवं अनुसंधान प्रभाग, बहुकार्य कर्मचारी वृंद (समूह 'ग' 


पद) भर्ती नियम, 2023 है। 


[भाग II—are 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 627 


(2) ये राजपत्र में उनके प्रकाशन की तारीख को प्रवृत्त होंगे। 

2. पद-संख्या, वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर.- पद संख्या, उसका वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर वह होगा, 
जो इन नियमों से उपाबद्ध अनुसूची के स्तंभ (2) से स्तंभ (4) में विनिर्दिष्ट है। 

3. भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं आदि.- भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं और sad पद से संबंधित 
अन्य बातें वे होंगी, जो पूर्वोक्त अनुसूची के स्तंभ (5) से स्तंभ (13) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 

4. निरहता.- वह व्यक्ति - 
(क) जिसने ऐसे व्यक्ति से, जिसका पति या जिसकी पत्नी जीवित है, विवाह किया है, या विवाह की संविदा की है; 

या 


(ख) जिसने अपने पति या अपनी पत्नी के जीवित रहते हुए किसी व्यक्ति से विवाह किया है, या विवाह की संविदा की 
है, उक्त पद पर नियुक्ति का पात्र नहीं होगा : 
परन्तु यदि केंद्रीय सरकार का यह समाधान हो जाता है कि ऐसा विवाह ऐसे व्यक्ति और विवाह के अन्य 
पक्षकार को लागू स्वीय विधि के अधीन अनुज्ञेय है और ऐसा करने के लिए अन्य आधार हैं तो वह किसी व्यक्ति को 
इस नियम के प्रवर्तन से छूट दे सकेगी। 

5. शिथिल करने की शक्ति.- जहां केन्द्रीय सरकार की यह राय है कि ऐसा करना आवश्यक या समीचीन है, वहां वह उसके 
लिए जो कारण हैं उन्हें लेखबद्द करके इन नियमों के किसी उपबंध को वर्ग या प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों की बाबत, आदेश 
द्वारा शिथिल कर सकेगी। 

6. ब्यावृत्ति.- इन नियमों की कोई बात, ऐसे आरक्षण, आयु-सीमा में छूट और अन्य रियायतों पर प्रभाव नहीं डालेगी, 
जिनका केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा इस संबंध में समय-समय पर जारी किए गए आदेशों के अनुसार अनुसूचित जातियों, 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों, भूतपूर्व सैनिकों और अन्य विशेष प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों के लिए उपबंध करना अपेक्षित है | 

अनुसूची 


पद का नाम पदों की संख्या वर्गीकरण चयन या 


अचयन पद 


पाधारण केन्द्रीय सेवा स्तर- लागू नहीं होता । 


ग' अराजपत्रित (18000-56900 रू) | 


18 से 25 वर्ष के बीच (केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा जारी अनुदेशों AT आदेशों के अनुसार सरकारी |किसी मान्यताप्राप्त बोर्ड 
सेवकों के लिए चालीस वर्ष तक शिथिल की जा सकती है)। से मैट्रिक उत्तीर्ण या 


टिप्पण 1 : आयु-सीमा अवधारित करने के लिए निर्णायक तारीख भारत में अभ्यर्थियों 
आवेदन प्राप्त करने की अंतिम तारीख होगी न कि वह अंतिम तारीख जो असम, मिजोरम, 
मणिपुर, नागालैंड, मेघालय, अरुणाचल प्रदेश, त्रिपुरा, सिक्षिम, लाहौल और स्पीति जिले 
और हिमाचल प्रदेश के चम्बा जिले का पांगी उपखंड, लद्दाख, अंडमान और निकोबार द्वीप 
समूह और लक्षद्वीप के संघ राज्य क्षेत्रों के लिए निहित की गई है। 


628 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


31:77 अमन mn] | 2: आयु-सीमा अवधारित करने के लिए निर्णायक तारीख वह होगी जो कर्मचारी 
चयन आयोग द्वारा विज्ञापित की जाए। 


टिप्पण 3 : केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा जारी किए गए अनुदेशों या आदेशों के अनुसार विभागीय 
अभ्यर्थी के लिए ऊपरी आयु सीमा चालीस वर्ष तक शिथिल की जा सकती है | 


आयु और शैक्षिक अहताएं प्रोन्नत व्यक्तियों की दशा | यदि कोई हो। ति द्वारा या प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन द्वारा तथा 
में लागू होंगी या नहीं। विभिन्न पद्धतियोंद्वारा भरी जाने वाली रि 
क्तियों की प्रतिशतता। 


या प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन द्वारा भर्ती की दश यदि विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति है तो उसकी संरचना। 
वे श्रेणियां जिनसे प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति/ 
केया जाएगा। 
(11) (12) 
लागू नहीं होता । समूह ‘wv’ विभागीय पुष्टि समिति (पुष्टि के संबंध में विचार करने वे 
लिए) जो निम्नलिखित से मिलकर बनेगी:- 

1) उप निदेशक (भंडारण एवं अनुसंधान) - अध्यक्ष; 
2) सहायक निदेशक (भंडारण एवं अनुसंधान) - सदस्य; 
3) अनुभाग अधिकारी (एसआरए/ई-3) - सदस्य। 


भर्ती करने में किन परिस्थितियो में संघ लोक सेवा आयोग से परामर्श किया जाएगा। 
(13) 
लागू नहीं होता | 


[फा. सं. ए-12018/01/2022-एसआरए (पार्ट-1)] 


संगीत कुमार, अवर सचिव 


New Delhi, the 11th August, 2023 


G.S.R. 104.—In exercise of the powers conferred by the proviso to article 309 of the Constitution, and in 
supersession of the Ministry of Consumer Affairs, Food and Public Distribution, Department of Food and Public 
Distribution, Storage & Research Division, Multi-Tasking Staff (MTS) Group ‘C’ Post Recruitment Rules, 2016, 
except as respects things done or omitted to be done before such supersession, the President hereby makes the 
following rules regulating the method of recruitment to the post of Multi-Tasking Staff in the Ministry of Consumer 
Affairs, Food and Public Distribution, Department of Food and Public Distribution, Storage & Research Division, 
namely:- 


1. Short title and commencement.- (1) These rules may be called the Ministry of Consumer Affairs, Food and 
Public Distribution, Department of Food and Public Distribution, Storage & Research Division, Multi-Tasking Staff 
(Group ‘C’ Post) Recruitment Rules, 2023. 


(2) They shall come into force on the date of their publication in the Official Gazette. 


2. Number of posts, classification and level in pay matrix. - The number of post, its classification and level 
in the pay matrix attached thereto shall be as specified in columns (2) to (4) of the Schedule annexed to these rules. 


3. Method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications, etc.- The method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications 
and other matters relating thereto shall be as specified in the columns (5) to (13) of the aforesaid Schedule. 


[भाग 1--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 


4. Disqualification.- No person, — 


629 


(a) who has entered into or contracted a marriage with a person having a spouse living; or 


(b) who, having a spouse living, has entered into or contracted a marriage with any person, 


shall be eligible for appointment to the said post: 


Provided that the Central Government may, if satisfied that such marriage is permissible under the personal law 
applicable to such person and the other party to the marriage and that there are other grounds for doing so, exempt any 


person from the operation of this rule. 


5. Power to relax.- Where the Central Government is of opinion that it is necessary or expedient so to do, it 
may, by order, and for reasons to be recorded in writing, relax any of the provisions of these rules with respect to any 


class or category of persons. 


6. Saving.- Nothing in these rules shall affect reservation, relaxation of age-limit and other concessions 
required to be provided to the Scheduled Castes, the Scheduled Tribes, the Ex-servicemen and other special categories 
of persons in accordance with the orders issued by the Central Government from time to time in this regard. 


SCHEDULE 
Name of | Number of posts Classification Level in pay matrix | Whether selection post 
post or non-selection post 
(1) (2) (3) (4) 6) 
Multi- 43* (2023) General Central Service, Level-1 Not applicable. 
Tasking (*Subject to variation | Group ‘C’, non-Gazetted, | (Rs.18000-56900). 
Staff dependent on | non-Ministerial. 
workload). 

Age-limit for direct recruits Educational and _ other 
qualifications required 
for direct recruits 

(6) (7) 
Between 18 and 25 years (Relaxable for Government servant up to forty years in | Matriculation pass from a 
accordance with the instructions or orders issued by the Central Government). recognized Board or 
equivalent. 
Note 1: The crucial date for determining the age-limit shall be the closing date for 
receipt of application from candidates in India and not the closing date prescribed for 
those in Assam, Mizoram, Manipur, Nagaland, Meghalaya, Arunachal Pradesh, Tripura, 
Sikkim, Lahaul and Spiti District and Pangi Sub-division of Chamba District of 
Himachal Pradesh, Union territories of Laddakh, Andaman and Nicobar Islands and 
Lakshadweep. 
Note 2 : The crucial date for determining the age-limit shall be as advertised by the 
Staff Selection Commission. 
Note 3 : The upper age-limit is relaxable for departmental candidate up to forty years in 
accordance with the instructions or order issued by the Central Government. 
Whether age and | Period of | Method of recruitment, whether | In case of recruitment by 
educational probation, by direct recruitment or by | promotion or deputation/ 
qualifications if any promotion or by | absorption grades from which 
prescribed for direct deputation/absorption and | promotion or 
recruits will apply in percentage of the vacancies to be | deputation/absorption to be made 
the case of promotees filled by various methods 
(8) (9) (10) (11) 
Not applicable. Two years. Direct recruitment. Not applicable. 


630 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


If a Departmental Promotion Committee exists, what is its | Circumstances in which Union Public 


composition Service Commission to be consulted in 
making recruitment 
(12) (13) 
Group ‘C’ Departmental Confirmation Committee for Not applicable. 


considering confirmation consisting of:- 


(1) Deputy Director (Storage & Research) - Chairperson; 
(2) Assistant Director (Storage & Research) - Member; 
(3) Section Officer (SRA/E.IID - Member. 


[F. No. A-12018/01/2022-SRA (Part-D)] 
SANGEET KUMAR, Under Secy. 


जल शक्ति मंत्रालय 
(जल संसाधन, नदी विकास और गंगा संरक्षण विभाग) 
नई दिल्‍ली, 11 अगस्त, 2023 


सा.का.नि. 105.---राष्ट्रपति, संविधान के अनुच्छेद 309 के परंतुक द्वारा प्रदत्त शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हुए और 
केन्द्रीय जल आयोग (समूह “A बेतार पद) भर्ती नियम, 2004 का ऐसे अधिक्रमण से पहले की गई या किए जाने से लोप की 


गई बातों के सिवाय, अधिक्रमण करते हुए जल संसाधन नदी विकास एवं गंगा संरक्षण विभाग, जल शक्ति मंत्रालय,के 
अधीन केन्द्रीय जल आयोग में सहायक अभियंता (संचार) के पद पर भर्ती की विधि को विनियमित करने के लिए 
निम्नलिखित नियम बनाती हैं, अर्थात्‌:- 


1. संक्षिप्त नाम और प्रांरभ..- (1) इन नियमों का संक्षिप्त नाम जल शक्ति मंत्रालय, जल संसाधन, नदी विकास और गंगा 
संरक्षण विभाग, केंद्रीय जल आयोग, सहायक अभियंता (संचार), समूह 'ख' पद, भर्ती नियम, 2023 है। 


(2) ये राजपत्र में प्रकाशन की तारीख को प्रवृत्त होंगे। 
2. पद की संख्या, वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर..- पद की संख्या, उसका वर्गीकरण और उससे सहबद्ध वेतन 
मैट्रिक्स में स्तर, इन नियमों के साथ उपाबद्ध अनुसूची के स्तम्भ (2) से (4) में यथावि निर्दिष्ट होगा | 
3. भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं आदि.-. भर्ती की विधि, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं और उससे संबंधित अन्य मामले, 
उपर्युक्त अनुसूची के स्तम्भ (5) से (13) में निर्दिष्ट होंगे। 
4. निरहईता.-- वह व्यक्ति, - 
(क) जिसने किसी ऐसे व्यक्ति के साथ विवाह किया है या विवाह का अनुबंध किया है जिसका पति या पत्नी 
जीवित है; या 
(a) जिसने अपने पति या पत्नी के जीवित रहते हुए, किसी अन्य व्यक्ति के साथ विवाह किया है या विवाह का 
अनुबंध किया है, 
उक्त पद पर नियुक्ति के लिए पात्र नहीं होगा : 
परंतु यदि केंद्रीय सरकार का यह समाधान हो जाता है कि ऐसा विवाह ऐसे व्यक्ति और विवाह के अन्य पक्षकार को 
लागू catty विधि के अधीन अनुज्ञेय है और ऐसा करने के लिए अन्य आधार हैं, तो वह किसी भी व्यक्ति को इस नियमके 
प्रवर्तन से छूट दे सकेगी। 
5. शिथिल करने की शक्ति.-- जहां केन्द्रीय सरकार की राय है कि ऐसा करना आवश्यक या समीचीन है, वहां वह 


आदेश द्वारा और उसके लिए जो कारण हैं उन्हें लेखबद्ध करके,तथा संघ लोक सेवा आयोग के परामर्श से किसी वर्ग या 
श्रेणी के व्यक्तियों के संबंध में इन नियमों के किसी भी उपबंध को शिथिल कर सकेगी। 


[भाग 1--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 631 


6. व्यावृत्ति.-- इन नियमों की कोई बात ऐसे आरक्षण, आयु सीमा में छूट और अन्य रियायतों पर प्रभाव नहीं डालेगी, 
जिनका केंद्रीय सरकार द्वारा इस संबंध में समय-समय पर निकाले गए आदेशों के अनुसार अनुसूचित जातियों, 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों, अन्य पिछड़े वर्गों, भूतपूर्व सैनिकों और अन्य विशेष प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों के लिए उपबंध करना 
अपेक्षित है। 


अनुसूची 
पद का नाम पदों की संख्या वर्गीकरण वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर 
(1) (2) (3) (4) 
सहायक अभियंता 20*(2023) साधारण केंद्रीय सेवा, स्तर- 7 
ety) * कार्य भार के आधार पर समूह 'ख', राजपत्रित, (44,900-1,42,400 रुपये) | 
परिवर्तन किया जा सकता है। अनुसचिवीय । 
चयन पद या गैर-चयन पद सीधी भर्ती के लिए आयु-सीमा 
(5) (6) 

चयन | तीस वर्षों से अधिक नहीं (केंद्रीय सरकार द्वारा जारी किए गए निर्देशों 

या आदेशों के अनुसार सरकारी कर्मचारियों के लिए पांच साल तक 
शिथिलनीय। 


टिप्पण: भारत में आयु-सीमा निर्धारित करने की महत्वपूर्ण तारीख 
अभ्यार्थियों से आवेदन प्राप्त करने की अंतिम तारीख होगी (न कि 


असम, मेघालय, अरुणाचल प्रदेश, मिजोरम, मणिपुर, नागालैंड, 
त्रिपुरा, सिक्षिम, लद्दाख संघ राज्यक्षेत्र प्रशासन, लाहौल और स्पीति 
जिले और हिमाचल प्रदेश के चंबा जिले के पांगी उप-मंडल अंदमान 


और निकोबार द्वीप समूह या लक्षद्वीप के लिए विहित समापन की 
तारीख)। 


सीधी भर्ती के लिए आवश्यक शैक्षिक और अन्य योग्यता | 


(7) 


अर्हताएं : किसी मान्यता प्राप्त विश्वविद्यालय या संस्थान से इलेक्ट्रॉनिक्स इंजीनियर्रिंग या इलेक्ट्रिकल इंजीनियरिंग या 
दूरसंचार इंजीनियर्रिंग या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक्स और संचार इंजीनियर्रिग में डिग्री। 

टिप्पण: अर्हताएं अन्यथा सुअर्हित अभ्यार्थियों की दशा में संघ लोक सेवा आयोग के विवेकानुसार, लेखबद्ध किए जाने वाले 
कारणों से शिथिल की जा सकती है। 

अनुभव: किसी भी मान्यता प्राप्त संस्थान या सरकारी कार्यालय या सार्वजनिक क्षेत्र के उपक्रम या वैधानिक या स्वायत्त 
संगठन से विभिन्न बेतार उपकरणों के प्रचालन और रखरखाव में दो साल का अनुभव। 

टिप्पण: अनुभव संबंधी अर्हताएं संघ लोक सेवा आयोग के विवेकानुसार लेखबद्ध किए जाने वाले कारणों से अनुसूचित 
जातियों और अनुसूचित जनजातियों के अभ्यार्थियों की दशा में तब शिथिल की जा सकती हैं जब चयन के किसी प्रक्रम पर 
संघ लोक सेवा आयोग की यह राय है कि उनके लिए आरक्षित रिक्तियों को भरने के लिए अपेक्षित अनुभव रखने वाले उन 
समुदायों के अभ्यार्थियों के पर्याप्त संख्या में उपलब्ध होने की संभावना नहीं है। 


632 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 


[PART II—SEc. 3(4)] 


क्या सीधी भर्ती के लिए | परिवीक्षा की अवधि, यदि कोई हो । भर्ती की पद्धति चाहे सीधी भर्ती द्वारा या 
विहित आयु और शैक्षिक प्रोन्नति द्वारा या प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन द्वारा 
were प्रोन्नति के और विभिन्न पद्धतियों से भरी जाने वाली 
मामले में लागू होगी । रिक्तियों की प्रतिशतता । 
(6) (9) (10) 
नहीं | सीधी भर्ती के लिए दो वर्ष । () 25 प्रतिशत सीधी भर्ती द्वारा; और 


टिप्पण: सीधी भर्ती वाले व्यक्तियों को 
परिवीक्षा पूरी करने के लिए राष्ट्रीय जल 
अकादमी, पुणे से बेतार या दूरमिति 


(1) 75 प्रतिशत प्रोन्नति द्वारा जिसके न हो 
सकने पर जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक 
संविदा भी है। 


नेटवर्क की स्थापना के लिए साइट चयन 
मानदंड, साइट पर संचार प्रणालियों की 
मरम्मत या रखरखाव आदि में संचार 
नेटवर्क मोड चार सप्ताह का अनिवार्य 
प्रेरण प्रशिक्षण, को सफलतापूर्वक पूरा 
करना अपेक्षित है। 


भर्ती के मामले में प्रोन्नति द्वारा या प्रतिनियुक्तिअवशोषण द्वारा, ऐसे ग्रेड जिनसे प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्तिआमेलन किया 
जाना है 


(11) 


प्रोन्नति : वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर-6(35,500 - 1,12,400 रुपये) में कनिष्ठ अभियंता (संचार) ग्रेड में पांच साल की 
नियमित सेवा के साथ और अनिवार्य कैरियर प्रशिक्षण नीति के अनुसार, संचार नेटवर्क के तरीकों में, बेतार या दूरमिति 
नेटवर्क की स्थापना के लिए साइट चयन मानदंड, साइट पर संचार प्रणालियों की मरम्मत या रखरखाव आदि में राष्ट्रीय 
जल अकादमी, पुणे से चार सप्ताह का सफलतापूर्वक अनिवार्य प्रशिक्षण पूरा करने पर । 
टिप्पण: जहा ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार किया जा रहा हो, वहां उनसे ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के 
संबंध में भी विचार किया जाएगा, परंतु यह तब जबकि उनके द्वारा की गई ऐसी ASH या पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक से 
या दो वर्ष से इनमें से भी कम हो, कम न हो और उन्होंने अपने से कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी अर्हक या पात्रता 
सेवा पहले ही पूरी कर ली है, अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक कर ली हो | 
प्रतिनियुक्ति (जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है): केंद्रीय सरकार या राज्य सरकार या संघ राज्य क्षेत्र प्रशासन या 
वैधानिक या स्वायत्त संगठन या सार्वजनिक क्षेत्र के उपक्रमों या मान्यता प्राप्त विश्वविद्यालय या मान्यता प्राप्त अनुसंधान 
संस्थानों के अधीन कार्य करने वाले ऐसे अधिकारी - 

(क) () मूल संवर्ग या विभाग में नियमित आधार पर सदृश पद धारण किए हो, या 

(1 मूल संवर्ग या विभाग में वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्‍्तर-6 (35400-112400 रुपये) या समतुल्य में पदों पर नियमित आधार 
पर नियुक्ति के पश्चात प्रदान किए गए ग्रेड में पांच साल की सेवापूरी की हो ; और 

(ख) स्तम्भ (7) के अधीन सीधी भर्ती के लिए विहित निम्नलिखित अर्हताएं योग्यता और अनुभव 
टिप्पण 1: पोषक प्रवर्ग में ऐसे विभागीय अधिकारी जो प्रोन्नति की सीधी पंक्ति में हैं, प्रतिनियुक्ति पर नियुक्ति के लिए 
विचार हेतु पात्र नहीं होंगे। इसी प्रकार, ऐसे प्रतिनियुक्ति धारक अधिकारी पदोन्नति द्वारा नियुक्ति पर विचार करने के लिए 
पात्र नहीं होंगे। 
टिप्पण 2: केंद्रीय सरकार के किसी अन्य संगठन या विभाग में इस नियुक्ति से ठीक पहले किसी अन्य Hex बाह्मपद में 
प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है सहित प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि जिसके अंतर्गत 
अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है साधारणतया तीन वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी। 


टिप्पण 3: प्रतिनियुक्ति जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए अधिकतम आयु सीमा आवेदन प्राप्त 
करने की अंतिम तारीख को छप्पन वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी।. 


[भाग 1--खण्ड 3(i)] भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 633 


यदि विभागीय पदोन्नति समिति है, तो इसकी संरचना क्‍या होगी। परिस्थितियां जिनके अधीन 
भर्ती करते समय संघ लोक 
सेवा आयोग से परामर्श किया 
जाना है। 
(12) (13) 
समूह 'ख' विभागीय पदोन्नति समिति (पदोन्नति पर विचार करने के लिए) में | पद पर सीधी भर्ती करने के 
निम्नलिखित सम्मिलित हैं: लिए संघ लोक सेवा आयोग 
1. मुख्य अभियंता, केंद्रीय जल आयोग - अध्यक्ष; के साथ परामर्श आवश्यक है। 
2. निदेशक या उप सचिव, जल शक्ति मंत्रालय, जल संसाधन, 
नदी विकास और गंगा संरक्षण विभाग - सदस्य; और 
3. सचिव, सीडब्ल्यूसी या निदेशक (प्रशासन) या निदेशक (स्थापना), 
केंद्रीय जल आयोग - सदस्य। 
समूह 'ख' विभागीय पुष्टिकरण समिति (पुष्टि पर विचार करने के लिए) में निम्नलिखित 
सम्मिलित हैं: 
1. मुख्य अभियंता, केंद्रीय जल आयोग - अध्यक्ष; 
2. निदेशक या उप सचिव, जल शक्ति मंत्रालय, जल संसाधन, 
नदी विकास और गंगा संरक्षण विभाग - सदस्य; और 
3. सचिव, केंद्रीय जल आयोग या निदेशक (प्रशासन) या निदेशक (स्थापना), 
केंद्रीय जल आयोग - सदस्य। 


[फा. सं. ए-12018/18/2017-ई-1] 


अनिल कुमार शर्मा, अवर सचिव 


MINISTRY OF JAL SHAKTI 
(Department of Water Resources, River Development and Ganga Rejuvenation) 
New Delhi, the 11th August, 2023 


G.S.R. 105.—In exercise of the powers conferred by the proviso to article 309 of the Constitution and in 
supersession of the Central Water Commission (Group 'B' Wireless Posts) Recruitment Rules, 2004, except as 
respects things done or omitted to be done before such supersession, the President hereby makes the following rules 
regulating the method of recruitment to the post of Assistant Engineer (Communication) in the Central Water 
Commission under the Department of Water Resources, River Development and Ganga Rejuvenation, Ministry of Jal 
Shakti, namely:- 


1. Short title and commencement.- (1) These rules may be called the Ministry of Jal Shakti, Department of Water 
Resources, River Development and Ganga Rejuvenation, Central Water Commission, Assistant Engineer 
(Communication),Group 'B' Post, Recruitment Rules, 2023. 


(2) They shall come into force on the date of their publication in the Official Gazette. 


2. Number of post, classification and level in pay matrix.— The number of post, its classification and level in the 
pay matrix attached thereto, shall be as specified in columns (2) to (4) of the Schedule annexed to these rules. 


3. Method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications, etc.— The method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications and 
other matters relating thereto, shall be as specified in columns (5) to (13) of the afore said Schedule. 


4. Disqualification.— No person, — 
(a) who has entered into or contracted a marriage with a person having a spouse living; or 
(b) who, having a spouse living, has entered into or contracted a marriage with any person, 


shall be eligible for appointment to the said post: 


634 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 [PART II—SEC. 3(i)] 


Provided that the Central Government may, if satisfied that such marriage is permissible under the personal law 
applicable to such person and the other party to the marriage and that there are other grounds for so doing, exempt any 
person from the operation of this rule. 


5. Power to relax.— Where the Central Government is of the opinion that it is necessary or expedient so to do, it may, 
by order and for reasons to be recorded in writing and in consultation with the Union Public Service Commission, 
relax any of the provisions of these rules with respect to any class or category of persons. 


6. Saving.- Nothing in these rules shall affect reservation, relaxation of age-limit and other concessions required to be 
provided for the Scheduled Castes, the Scheduled Tribes, the Other Backward Classes, the Ex-servicemen and other 
special categories of persons in accordance with the orders issued by the Central Government from time to time in this 
regard. 


SCHEDULE 
Name of post Number | Classification Level in pay Selection post Age-limit for direct 
of post matrix or recruits 
non-selection 
post 
(1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) 

Assistant 20*(2023) General Central Level- 7 Selection. Not exceeding _ thirty 
Engineer * Subject | Service, Group 13 (Rs 44,900- years (relaxable for 
(Communication). to Gazetted, Non- 1,42,400). Government _ servants 
variation Ministerial. up to five years in 
dependent accordance with 
on work instructions or orders 
load. issue by Central 


Government). 


Note: The crucial date 
for determining the age- 
limit shall be the 
closing date for receipt 
of applications from 
candidates in India (and 
not the closing date 
prescribed for those in 
Assam, Meghalaya, 
Arunachal Pradesh, 


Mizoram, Manipur, 
Nagaland, Tripura, 
Sikkim, Union 


Territory administration 
of Ladakh, Lahaul and 
Spiti District and Pangi 
Sub-division of 
Chamba District of 
Himachal Pradesh, 
Andaman and Nicobar 
Islands or 
Lakshadweep). 


Educational and other qualifications required for direct recruits 


(7) 


Qualification: A degree in electronics engineering or electrical engineering or telecommunication engineering or 
electronics and communication engineering from a recognised University or institute. 


Note: Qualifications are relaxable at the discretion of the Union Public Service Commission, for reasons to be 
recorded in writing, in the case of candidates otherwise well qualified. 


Experience: Two years experience in operation and maintenance of various wireless equipment from any recognised 
institute or government office or public sector undertaking or statutory or autonomous organisation. 


Note: The qualifications regarding experience is/are relaxable at the discretion of the Union Public Service 


[भाग II—ave 3(i)] 


भारत का राजपत्र: अगस्त 19, 2023/श्रावण 28, 1945 635 


Commission, for reasons to be recorded in writing in the case of candidates belonging to Scheduled Castes or 
Scheduled Tribes if at any stage of selection the U.P.S.C., is of the opinion that sufficient number of candidates from 
these communities possessing the requisite experience are not likely to be available to fill up the vacancies reserved 


for them. 


Whether age | Period of | Method of | In case of recruitment by promotion or by 
and probation, if any | recruitment deputation/ absorption, grades from which 
educational whether by direct | promotion or deputation/absorption to be made. 
qualifications recruitment or by 
prescribed promotion or by 
for direct deputation/ 
recruits will absorption and 
apply in the percentage of the 
case of vacancies to be 
promotes. filled by various 
methods. 
(8) (9) (10) (11) 
No. Two years for | (i) 25 per cent. by | Promotion: Junior Engineer (Communication) in 
direct recruits. direct recruitment; Level-6 (Rs.35,500 - 1,12,400) in the pay matrix 
‘ and with five years of regular service in the grade and 
Note: Direct ‘ f 7 
: having successfully completed mandatory training 
recruits are | (ii) 75 percent. by Careet ‘Traini : ff 
20 46 107 failing as per mandatory eer Training Policy, of four 
aoe ties f शि0 : weeks in modes of communication network, site 
successfully which by deputation हैँ ee oe : f wi 
४ : selection criteria for installation of wireless or 
complete a | (including short term है : f 
telemetry network, repair or maintenance o 
mandatory contract). 


induction training 
of four weeks in 


modes of 
communication 
network, site 


selection criteria 
for installation of 
wireless or 
telemetry 

network, repair or 
maintenance of 


communication 
systems at site 
etc. from 
National Water 
Academy, Pune, 
for completion of 
probation. 


communication systems at site etc. from National 
Water Academy, Pune. 


Note: Where juniors who have completed their 
qualifying or eligibility service are being 
considered for promotion, their seniors would also 
be considered provided they are not short of the 
requisite qualifying or eligibility service by more 
than half of such qualifying or eligibility service or 
two years, whichever is less and have successfully 
completed their probation period for promotion to 
the next higher grade along with their juniors who 
have already completed such qualifying or 
eligibility service. 


Deputation (including short-term contract): 
Officers under Central Government or State 
Government or Union Territory administrations or 
statutory or autonomous organisation or public 
sector undertakings or recognised University or 
recognised research institutions,- 


(a) (i) holding analogous post on a regular basis in 
the parent cadre or department; or 


(ii) with five years service in the grade rendered 
after appointment thereto on regular basis in posts 
in level-6 (Rs.35400-112400) in the pay matrix or 
equivalent in the parent cadre or department; and 


(b) possessing the following qualification and 
experience prescribed for direct recruits under 
column (7). 


Note 1: The departmental officers in the feeder 
category who are in the direct line of promotion 
shall not be eligible for consideration for 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : AUGUST 19, 2023/SHRAVANA 28, 1945 


[PART II—SEc. 3(4)] 


appointment on deputation. Similarly, the 
deputationists shall not be eligible for 
consideration for appointment by promotion. 


Note 2: The period of deputation (including short- 
term contract) including period of deputation 
(including short-term contract) in another ex-cadre 
post held immediately preceding this appointment 
in the same or some other organisation or 
department of the Central Government shall 
ordinarily not exceed three years. 


Note 3: The maximum age limit for appointment 
by deputation (including short-term contract) shall 
not exceed fifty six years as on the closing date of 


receipt of applications. 


If a Departmental Promotion Committee exists, what is its composition 


Circumstances under which 
the Union Public Service 
Commission is to be 
consulted in making 
recruitment 


(12) 


(13) 


Group ‘B’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for considering promotion) 
consisting of : 
1. Chief Engineer, Central Water Commission — Chairman; 


2. Director or Deputy Secretary, Ministry of Jal Shakti, Department 
of Water Resources, River Development and Ganga Rejuvenation — Member; and 


3. Secretary, CWC or Director (Administration) or Director 


(Establishment), Central Water Commission - Member. 
Group ‘B’ Departmental Confirmation Committee (for considering 
confirmation) consisting of: 

1. Chief Engineer, Central Water Commission — Chairman; 


2. Director or Deputy Secretary, Ministry of Jal Shakti, Department of Water 
Resources, River Development and Ganga Rejuvenation — Member; and 


3. Secretary, Central Water Commission or Director (Administration) or Director 
(Establishment), Central Water Commission - Member. 


Consultation with Union Public 
Service Commission is 
necessary for making direct 
recruitment to the post. 


[F. No. A-12018/18/2017-E-]] 


ANIL KUMAR SHARMA, Under Secy. 


Uploaded by Dte. of Printing at Government of India Press, Ring Road, Mayapuri, New Delhi-110064 


and Published by the Controller of Publications, Delhi-110054. mano: 


KUMAR VERMA. 


